Ohio, session 136, HB794.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 2929.01, 2929.14, 2929.144, 2929.19, 2953.08, 2967.193, and 2967.194 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: Sec. 2929.01. As used in this chapter: (A)(1) "Alternative residential facility" means, subject to divisions (A)(2) and (3) of this section, any facility other than an offender's home or residence in which an offender is assigned to live and that satisfies all of the following criteria: (a) It provides programs through which the offender may seek or maintain employment or may receive education, training, treatment, or habilitation. (b) It has received the appropriate license or certificate for any specialized education, training, treatment, habilitation, or other service that it provides from the government agency that is responsible for licensing or certifying that type of education, training, treatment, habilitation, or service. (2) "Alternative residential facility" does not include a community-based correctional facility, jail, halfway house, or prison. (3) "Alternative residential facility" includes a community alternative sentencing center or district community alternative sentencing center when authorized by section 307.932 of the Revised Code and when the center is being used for an OVI term of confinement, as defined by that section. (B) "Basic probation supervision" means a requirement that the offender maintain contact with a person appointed to supervise the offender in accordance with sanctions imposed by the court or imposed by the parole board pursuant to section 2967.28 of the Revised Code. "Basic probation supervision" includes basic parole supervision and basic post-release control supervision. (C) "Cocaine," "fentanyl-related compound," "hashish," "L.S.D.," and "unit dose" have the same meanings as in section 2925.01 of the Revised Code. (D) "Community-based correctional facility" means a community-based correctional facility and program or district community-based correctional facility and program developed pursuant to sections 2301.51 to 2301.58 of the Revised Code. (E) "Community control sanction" means a sanction that is not a prison term and that is described in section 2929.15, 2929.16, 2929.17, or 2929.18 of the Revised Code or a sanction that is not a jail term and that is described in section 2929.26, 2929.27, or 2929.28 of the Revised Code. "Community control sanction" includes probation if the sentence involved was imposed for a felony that was committed prior to July 1, 1996, or if the sentence involved was imposed for a misdemeanor that was committed prior to January 1, 2004. (F) "Controlled substance," "marihuana," "schedule I," and "schedule II" have the same meanings as in section 3719.01 of the Revised Code. (G) "Curfew" means a requirement that an offender during a specified period of time be at a designated place. (H) "Day reporting" means a sanction pursuant to which an offender is required each day to report to and leave a center or other approved reporting location at specified times in order to participate in work, education or training, treatment, and other approved programs at the center or outside the center. (I) "Deadly weapon" has the same meaning as in section 2923.11 of the Revised Code. (J) "Drug and alcohol use monitoring" means a program under which an offender agrees to submit to random chemical analysis of the offender's blood, breath, or urine to determine whether the offender has ingested any alcohol or other drugs. (K) "Drug treatment program" means any program under which a person undergoes assessment and treatment designed to reduce or completely eliminate the person's physical or emotional reliance upon alcohol, another drug, or alcohol and another drug and under which the person may be required to receive assessment and treatment on an outpatient basis or may be required to reside at a facility other than the person's home or residence while undergoing assessment and treatment. (L) "Economic loss" means any economic detriment suffered by a victim as a direct and proximate result of the commission of an offense and includes any loss of income due to lost time at work because of any injury caused to the victim, any property loss, medical cost, or funeral expense incurred as a result of the commission of the offense, and the cost of any accounting or auditing done to determine the extent of loss if the cost is incurred and payable by the victim. "Economic loss" does not include non-economic loss or any punitive or exemplary damages. (M) "Education or training" includes study at, or in conjunction with a program offered by, a university, college, or technical college or vocational study and also includes the completion of primary school, secondary school, and literacy curricula or their equivalent. (N) "Firearm" has the same meaning as in section 2923.11 of the Revised Code. (O) "Halfway house" means a facility licensed by the division of parole and community services of the department of rehabilitation and correction pursuant to section 2967.14 of the Revised Code as a suitable facility for the care and treatment of adult offenders. (P) "House arrest" means a period of confinement of an offender that is in the offender's home or in other premises specified by the sentencing court or by the parole board pursuant to section 2967.28 of the Revised Code and during which all of the following apply: (1) The offender is required to remain in the offender's home or other specified premises for the specified period of confinement, except for periods of time during which the offender is at the offender's place of employment or at other premises as authorized by the sentencing court or by the parole board. (2) The offender is required to report periodically to a person designated by the court or parole board. (3) The offender is subject to any other restrictions and requirements that may be imposed by the sentencing court or by the parole board. (Q) "Intensive probation supervision" means a requirement that an offender maintain frequent contact with a person appointed by the court, or by the parole board pursuant to section 2967.28 of the Revised Code, to supervise the offender while the offender is seeking or maintaining necessary employment and participating in training, education, and treatment programs as required in the court's or parole board's order. "Intensive probation supervision" includes intensive parole supervision and intensive post-release control supervision. (R) "Jail" means a jail, workhouse, minimum security jail, or other residential facility used for the confinement of alleged or convicted offenders that is operated by a political subdivision or a combination of political subdivisions of this state. (S) "Jail term" means the term in a jail that a sentencing court imposes or is authorized to impose pursuant to section 2929.24 or 2929.25 of the Revised Code or pursuant to any other provision of the Revised Code that authorizes a term in a jail for a misdemeanor conviction. (T) "Mandatory jail term" means the term in a jail that a sentencing court is required to impose pursuant to division (G) of section 1547.99 of the Revised Code, division (E) of section 2903.06 or division (D) of section 2903.08 of the Revised Code, division (F) of section 2929.24 of the Revised Code, division (B) of section 4510.14 of the Revised Code, or division (G) of section 4511.19 of the Revised Code or pursuant to any other provision of the Revised Code that requires a term in a jail for a misdemeanor conviction. (U) "Delinquent child" has the same meaning as in section 2152.02 of the Revised Code. (V) "License violation report" means a report that is made by a sentencing court, or by the parole board pursuant to section 2967.28 of the Revised Code, to the regulatory or licensing board or agency that issued an offender a professional license or a license or permit to do business in this state and that specifies that the offender has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to an offense that may violate the conditions under which the offender's professional license or license or permit to do business in this state was granted or an offense for which the offender's professional license or license or permit to do business in this state may be revoked or suspended. (W) "Major drug offender" means an offender who is convicted of or pleads guilty to the possession of, sale of, or offer to sell any drug, compound, mixture, preparation, or substance that consists of or contains at least one thousand grams of hashish; at least one hundred grams of cocaine; at least one thousand unit doses or one hundred grams of heroin; at least five thousand unit doses of L.S.D. or five hundred grams of L.S.D. in a liquid concentrate, liquid extract, or liquid distillate form; at least fifty grams of a controlled substance analog; at least one thousand unit doses or one hundred grams of a fentanyl-related compound; or at least one hundred times the amount of any other schedule I or II controlled substance other than marihuana that is necessary to commit a felony of the third degree pursuant to section 2925.03, 2925.04, 2925.05, or 2925.11 of the Revised Code that is based on the possession of, sale of, or offer to sell the controlled substance. (X) "Mandatory prison term" means any of the following: (1) Subject to division (X)(2) of this section, the term in prison that must be imposed for the offenses or circumstances set forth in divisions (F)(1) to (8) or (F)(12) to (21) of section 2929.13 and division (B) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code. Except as provided in sections 2925.02, 2925.03, 2925.04, 2925.05, and 2925.11 of the Revised Code, unless the maximum or another specific term is required under section 2929.14 or 2929.142 of the Revised Code, a mandatory prison term described in this division may be any prison term authorized for the level of offense except that if the offense is a felony of the first or second degree committed on or after March 22, 2019, a mandatory prison term described in this division may be one of the terms prescribed in division (A)(1)(a) or (2)(a) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code, whichever is applicable, that is authorized as the minimum term for the offense. (2) The term of sixty or one hundred twenty days in prison that a sentencing court is required to impose for a third or fourth degree felony OVI offense pursuant to division (G)(2) of section 2929.13 and division (G)(1)(d) or (e) of section 4511.19 of the Revised Code or the term of one, two, three, four, or five years in prison that a sentencing court is required to impose pursuant to division (G)(2) of section 2929.13 of the Revised Code. (3) The term in prison imposed pursuant to division (A) of section 2971.03 of the Revised Code for the offenses and in the circumstances described in division (F)(11) of section 2929.13 of the Revised Code or pursuant to division (B)(1)(a), (b), or (c), (B)(2)(a), (b), or (c), or (B)(3)(a), (b), (c), or (d) of section 2971.03 of the Revised Code and that term as modified or terminated pursuant to section 2971.05 of the Revised Code. (Y) "Monitored time" means a period of time during which an offender continues to be under the control of the sentencing court or parole board, subject to no conditions other than leading a law-abiding life. (Z) "Offender" means a person who, in this state, is convicted of or pleads guilty to a felony or a misdemeanor. (AA) "Prison" means a residential facility used for the confinement of convicted felony offenders that is under the control of the department of rehabilitation and correction and includes a violation sanction center operated under authority of section 2967.141 of the Revised Code. (BB)(1) "Prison term" includes either of the following sanctions for an offender: (a) A stated prison term; (b) A term in a prison shortened by, or with the approval of, the sentencing court pursuant to section 2929.143, 2929.20, 5120.031, 5120.032, or 5120.073 of the Revised Code or shortened pursuant to section 2967.26 of the Revised Code. (2) With respect to a non-life felony indefinite prison term, references in any provision of law to a reduction of, or deduction from, the prison term mean a reduction in, or deduction from, the minimum term imposed as part of the indefinite term. (CC) "Repeat violent offender" means a person about whom both of the following apply: (1) The person is being sentenced for committing or for complicity in committing any of the following: (a) Aggravated murder, murder, any felony of the first or second degree that is an offense of violence, or an attempt to commit any of these offenses if the attempt is a felony of the first or second degree; (b) An offense under an existing or former law of this state, another state, or the United States that is or was substantially equivalent to an offense described in division (CC)(1)(a) of this section. (2) The person previously was convicted of or pleaded guilty to an offense described in division (CC)(1)(a) or (b) of this section. (DD) "Sanction" means any penalty imposed upon an offender who is convicted of or pleads guilty to an offense, as punishment for the offense. "Sanction" includes any sanction imposed pursuant to any provision of sections 2929.14 to 2929.18 or 2929.24 to 2929.28 of the Revised Code. (EE) "Sentence" means the sanction or combination of sanctions imposed by the sentencing court on an offender who is convicted of or pleads guilty to an offense. (FF)(1) "Stated prison term" means the prison term, mandatory prison term, or combination of all prison terms and mandatory prison terms imposed by the sentencing court pursuant to section 2929.14, 2929.142, or 2971.03 of the Revised Code or under section 2919.25 of the Revised Code. "Stated prison term" includes any credit received by the offender for time spent in jail awaiting trial, sentencing, or transfer to prison for the offense and any time spent under house arrest or house arrest with electronic monitoring imposed after earning credits pursuant to section 2967.193 or 2967.194 of the Revised Code. If an offender is serving a prison term as a risk reduction sentence under sections 2929.143 and 5120.036 of the Revised Code, "stated prison term" includes any period of time by which the prison term imposed upon the offender is shortened by the offender's successful completion of all assessment and treatment or programming pursuant to those sections. (2) As used in the definition of "stated prison term" set forth in division (FF)(1) of this section, a prison term is a definite prison term imposed under section 2929.14 of the Revised Code or any other provision of law, is the minimum and maximum prison terms under a non-life felony indefinite prison term, or is a term of life imprisonment except to the extent that the use of that definition in a section of the Revised Code clearly is not intended to include a term of life imprisonment. With respect to an offender sentenced to a non-life felony indefinite prison term, references in section 2967.191, 2967.193, or 2967.194 of the Revised Code or any other provision of law to a reduction of, or deduction from, the offender's stated prison term or to release of the offender before the expiration of the offender's stated prison term mean a reduction in, or deduction from, the minimum term imposed as part of the indefinite term or a release of the offender before the expiration of that minimum term, references in section 2929.19 or 2967.28 of the Revised Code to a stated prison term with respect to a prison term imposed for a violation of a post-release control sanction mean the minimum term so imposed, and references in any provision of law to an offender's service of the offender's stated prison term or the expiration of the offender's stated prison term mean service or expiration of the minimum term so imposed plus any additional period of incarceration under the sentence that is required under section 2967.271 of the Revised Code. (GG) "Victim-offender mediation" means a reconciliation or mediation program that involves an offender and the victim of the offense committed by the offender and that includes a meeting in which the offender and the victim may discuss the offense, discuss restitution, and consider other sanctions for the offense. (HH) "Fourth degree felony OVI offense" means a violation of division (A) of section 4511.19 of the Revised Code that, under division (G) of that section, is a felony of the fourth degree. (II) "Mandatory term of local incarceration" means the term of sixty or one hundred twenty days in a jail, a community-based correctional facility, a halfway house, or an alternative residential facility that a sentencing court may impose upon a person who is convicted of or pleads guilty to a fourth degree felony OVI offense pursuant to division (G)(1) of section 2929.13 of the Revised Code and division (G)(1)(d) or (e) of section 4511.19 of the Revised Code. (JJ) "Designated homicide, assault, or kidnapping offense," "violent sex offense," "sexual motivation specification," "sexually violent offense," "sexually violent predator," and "sexually violent predator specification" have the same meanings as in section 2971.01 of the Revised Code. (KK) "Sexually oriented offense," "child-victim oriented offense," and "tier III sex offender/child-victim offender" have the same meanings as in section 2950.01 of the Revised Code. (LL) An offense is "committed in the vicinity of a child" if the offender commits the offense within thirty feet of or within the same residential unit as a child who is under eighteen years of age, regardless of whether the offender knows the age of the child or whether the offender knows the offense is being committed within thirty feet of or within the same residential unit as the child and regardless of whether the child actually views the commission of the offense. (MM) "Family or household member" has the same meaning as in section 2919.25 of the Revised Code. (NN) "Motor vehicle" and "manufactured home" have the same meanings as in section 4501.01 of the Revised Code. (OO) "Detention" and "detention facility" have the same meanings as in section 2921.01 of the Revised Code. (PP) "Third degree felony OVI offense" means a violation of division (A) of section 4511.19 of the Revised Code that, under division (G) of that section, is a felony of the third degree. (QQ) "Random drug testing" has the same meaning as in section 5120.63 of the Revised Code. (RR) "Felony sex offense" has the same meaning as in section 2967.28 of the Revised Code. (SS) "Body armor" has the same meaning as in section 2941.1411 of the Revised Code. (TT) "Electronic monitoring" means monitoring through the use of an electronic monitoring device. (UU) "Electronic monitoring device" means any of the following: (1) Any device that can be operated by electrical or battery power and that conforms with all of the following: (a) The device has a transmitter that can be attached to a person, that will transmit a specified signal to a receiver of the type described in division (UU)(1)(b) of this section if the transmitter is removed from the person, turned off, or altered in any manner without prior court approval in relation to electronic monitoring or without prior approval of the department of rehabilitation and correction in relation to the use of an electronic monitoring device for an inmate on transitional control or otherwise is tampered with, that can transmit continuously and periodically a signal to that receiver when the person is within a specified distance from the receiver, and that can transmit an appropriate signal to that receiver if the person to whom it is attached travels a specified distance from that receiver. (b) The device has a receiver that can receive continuously the signals transmitted by a transmitter of the type described in division (UU)(1)(a) of this section, can transmit continuously those signals by a wireless or landline telephone connection to a central monitoring computer of the type described in division (UU)(1)(c) of this section, and can transmit continuously an appropriate signal to that central monitoring computer if the device has been turned off or altered without prior court approval or otherwise tampered with. The device is designed specifically for use in electronic monitoring, is not a converted wireless phone or another tracking device that is clearly not designed for electronic monitoring, and provides a means of text-based or voice communication with the person. (c) The device has a central monitoring computer that can receive continuously the signals transmitted by a wireless or landline telephone connection by a receiver of the type described in division (UU)(1)(b) of this section and can monitor continuously the person to whom an electronic monitoring device of the type described in division (UU)(1)(a) of this section is attached. (2) Any device that is not a device of the type described in division (UU)(1) of this section and that conforms with all of the following: (a) The device includes a transmitter and receiver that can monitor and determine the location of a subject person at any time, or at a designated point in time, through the use of a central monitoring computer or through other electronic means. (b) The device includes a transmitter and receiver that can determine at any time, or at a designated point in time, through the use of a central monitoring computer or other electronic means the fact that the transmitter is turned off or altered in any manner without prior approval of the court in relation to the electronic monitoring or without prior approval of the department of rehabilitation and correction in relation to the use of an electronic monitoring device for an inmate on transitional control or otherwise is tampered with. (3) Any type of technology that can adequately track or determine the location of a subject person at any time and that is approved by the director of rehabilitation and correction, including, but not limited to, any satellite technology, voice tracking system, or retinal scanning system that is so approved. (VV) "Non-economic loss" means nonpecuniary harm suffered by a victim of an offense as a result of or related to the commission of the offense, including, but not limited to, pain and suffering; loss of society, consortium, companionship, care, assistance, attention, protection, advice, guidance, counsel, instruction, training, or education; mental anguish; and any other intangible loss. (WW) "Prosecutor" has the same meaning as in section 2935.01 of the Revised Code. (XX) "Continuous alcohol monitoring" means the ability to automatically test and periodically transmit alcohol consumption levels and tamper attempts at least every hour, regardless of the location of the person who is being monitored. (YY) A person is "adjudicated a sexually violent predator" if the person is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violent sex offense and also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a sexually violent predator specification that was included in the indictment, count in the indictment, or information charging that violent sex offense or if the person is convicted of or pleads guilty to a designated homicide, assault, or kidnapping offense and also is convicted of or pleads guilty to both a sexual motivation specification and a sexually violent predator specification that were included in the indictment, count in the indictment, or information charging that designated homicide, assault, or kidnapping offense. (ZZ) An offense is "committed in proximity to a school" if the offender commits the offense in a school safety zone or within five hundred feet of any school building or the boundaries of any school premises, regardless of whether the offender knows the offense is being committed in a school safety zone or within five hundred feet of any school building or the boundaries of any school premises. (AAA) "Human trafficking" means a scheme or plan to which all of the following apply: (1) Its object is one or both of the following: (a) To subject a victim or victims to involuntary servitude, as defined in section 2905.31 of the Revised Code or to compel a victim or victims to engage in sexual activity for hire, to engage in a performance that is obscene, sexually oriented, or nudity oriented, or to be a model or participant in the production of material that is obscene, sexually oriented, or nudity oriented; (b) To facilitate, encourage, or recruit a victim who is a minor or is a person with a developmental disability, or victims who are minors or are persons with developmental disabilities, for any purpose listed in divisions (A)(2)(a) to (c) of section 2905.32 of the Revised Code. (2) It involves at least two felony offenses, whether or not there has been a prior conviction for any of the felony offenses, to which all of the following apply: (a) Each of the felony offenses is a violation of section 2905.01, 2905.02, 2905.32, 2907.21, 2907.22, or 2923.32, division (A)(1) or (2) of section 2907.323, or division (B)(1), (2), (3), (4), or (5) of section 2919.22 of the Revised Code or is a violation of a law of any state other than this state that is substantially similar to any of the sections or divisions of the Revised Code identified in this division. (b) At least one of the felony offenses was committed in this state. (c) The felony offenses are related to the same scheme or plan and are not isolated instances. (BBB) "Material," "nudity," "obscene," "performance," and "sexual activity" have the same meanings as in section 2907.01 of the Revised Code. (CCC) "Material that is obscene, sexually oriented, or nudity oriented" means any material that is obscene, that shows a person participating or engaging in sexual activity, masturbation, or bestiality, or that shows a person in a state of nudity. (DDD) "Performance that is obscene, sexually oriented, or nudity oriented" means any performance that is obscene, that shows a person participating or engaging in sexual activity, masturbation, or bestiality, or that shows a person in a state of nudity. (EEE) "Accelerant" means a fuel or oxidizing agent, such as an ignitable liquid, used to initiate a fire or increase the rate of growth or spread of a fire. (FFF) "Permanent disabling harm" means serious physical harm that results in permanent injury to the intellectual, physical, or sensory functions and that permanently and substantially impairs a person's ability to meet one or more of the ordinary demands of life, including the functions of caring for one's self, performing manual tasks, walking, seeing, hearing, speaking, breathing, learning, and working. (GGG) "Non-life felony indefinite prison term" means a prison term imposed under division (A)(1)(a) or (2)(a)(A) of section 2929.14 and section 2929.144 of the Revised Code for a felony of the first or second degree committed on or after March 22, 2019. Sec. 2929.14. (A) Except as provided in division (B)(1), (B)(2), (B)(3), (B)(4), (B)(5), (B)(6), (B)(7), (B)(8), (B)(9), (B)(10), (B)(11), (E), (G), (H), (J), or (K) of this section or in division (D)(6) of section 2919.25 of the Revised Code and except in relation to an offense for which a sentence of death or life imprisonment is to be imposed, if the court imposing a sentence upon an offender for a felony elects or is required to impose a prison term on the offender pursuant to this chapter, the court shall impose a prison term that shall be one of the following: (1)(a) For a felony of the first degree committed on or after March 22, 2019, the prison term shall be an indefinite prison term with a stated minimum term selected by the court of three, four, five, six, seven, eight, nine, ten, or eleven years and a maximum term that is determined pursuant to section 2929.144 of the Revised Code, except that if the section that criminalizes the conduct constituting the felony specifies a different minimum term or penalty for the offense, the specific language of that section shall control in determining the minimum term or otherwise sentencing the offender but the minimum term or sentence imposed under that specific language shall be considered for purposes of the Revised Code as if it had been imposed under this division. (b) For a felony of the first degree committed prior to March 22, 2019, the prison term shall be a definite prison term of three, four, five, six, seven, eight, nine, ten, or eleven years. (2)(a) For a felony of the second degree committed on or after March 22, 2019, the prison term shall be an indefinite prison term with a stated minimum term selected by the court of two, three, four, five, six, seven, or eight years and a maximum term that is determined pursuant to section 2929.144 of the Revised Code, except that if the section that criminalizes the conduct constituting the felony specifies a different minimum term or penalty for the offense, the specific language of that section shall control in determining the minimum term or otherwise sentencing the offender but the minimum term or sentence imposed under that specific language shall be considered for purposes of the Revised Code as if it had been imposed under this division. (b) For a felony of the second degree committed prior to March 22, 2019, the prison term shall be a definite term of two, three, four, five, six, seven, or eight years. (3)(a) For a felony of the third degree that is a violation of section 2903.06, 2903.08, 2907.03, 2907.04, 2907.05, 2907.321, 2907.322, 2907.323, 2919.25, or 3795.04 of the Revised Code, that is a violation of division (A) of section 4511.19 of the Revised Code if the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of division (A) of that section that was a felony, that is a violation of section 2911.02 or 2911.12 of the Revised Code if the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty in two or more separate proceedings to two or more violations of section 2911.01, 2911.02, 2911.11, or 2911.12 of the Revised Code, or that is a violation of division (B) of section 2921.331 of the Revised Code if division (C)(5) of that section applies, the prison term shall be a definite an indefinite prison term with a stated minimum term selected by the court of twelve, eighteen, twenty-four, thirty, thirty-six, forty-two, forty-eight, fifty-four, or sixty months and a maximum term that is determined pursuant to section 2929.144 of the Revised Code, except that if the section of the Revised Code that criminalizes the conduct constituting the felony specifies a different minimum term or penalty for the offense, the specific language of that section controls in determining the minimum term or otherwise sentencing the offender, but the minimum term or sentence imposed under that specific language shall be considered for purposes of the Revised Code as if it had been imposed under this division. (b) For a felony of the third degree that is not an offense for which division (A)(3)(a) of this section applies, the prison term shall be a definite an indefinite prison term with a stated minimum term selected by the court of nine, twelve, eighteen, twenty-four, thirty, or thirty-six months and a maximum term that is determined pursuant to section 2929.144 of the Revised Code, except that if the section of the Revised Code that criminalizes the conduct constituting the felony specifies a different minimum term or penalty for the offense, the specific language of that section controls in determining the minimum term or otherwise sentencing the offender, but the minimum term or sentence imposed under that specific language shall be considered for purposes of the Revised Code as if it had been imposed under this division. (4) For a felony of the fourth degree, the prison term shall be a definite an indefinite prison term with a stated minimum term selected by the court of six, seven, eight, nine, ten, eleven, twelve, thirteen, fourteen, fifteen, sixteen, seventeen, or eighteen months and a maximum term that is determined pursuant to section 2929.144 of the Revised Code, except that if the section of the Revised Code that criminalizes the conduct constituting the felony specifies a different minimum term or penalty for the offense, the specific language of that section controls in determining the minimum term or otherwise sentencing the offender, but the minimum term or sentence imposed under that specific language shall be considered for purposes of the Revised Code as if it had been imposed under this division. (5) For a felony of the fifth degree, the prison term shall be a definite an indefinite prison term with a stated minimum term selected by the court of six, seven, eight, nine, ten, eleven, or twelve months and a maximum term that is determined pursuant to section 2929.144 of the Revised Code, except that if the section of the Revised Code that criminalizes the conduct constituting the felony specifies a different minimum term or penalty for the offense, the specific language of that section controls in determining the minimum term or otherwise sentencing the offender, but the minimum term or sentence imposed under that specific language shall be considered for purposes of the Revised Code as if it had been imposed under this division. (B)(1)(a) Except as provided in division (B)(1)(e) of this section, if an offender who is convicted of or pleads guilty to a felony also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a specification of the type described in section 2941.141, 2941.144, or 2941.145 of the Revised Code, the court shall impose on the offender one of the following prison terms: (i) A prison term of six years if the specification is of the type described in division (A) of section 2941.144 of the Revised Code that charges the offender with having a firearm that is an automatic firearm or that was equipped with a firearm muffler or suppressor on or about the offender's person or under the offender's control while committing the offense; (ii) A prison term of three years if the specification is of the type described in division (A) of section 2941.145 of the Revised Code that charges the offender with having a firearm on or about the offender's person or under the offender's control while committing the offense and displaying the firearm, brandishing the firearm, indicating that the offender possessed the firearm, or using it to facilitate the offense; (iii) A prison term of one year if the specification is of the type described in division (A) of section 2941.141 of the Revised Code that charges the offender with having a firearm on or about the offender's person or under the offender's control while committing the offense; (iv) A prison term of nine years if the specification is of the type described in division (D) of section 2941.144 of the Revised Code that charges the offender with having a firearm that is an automatic firearm or that was equipped with a firearm muffler or suppressor on or about the offender's person or under the offender's control while committing the offense and specifies that the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a specification of the type described in section 2941.141, 2941.144, 2941.145, 2941.146, or 2941.1412 of the Revised Code; (v) A prison term of fifty-four months if the specification is of the type described in division (D) of section 2941.145 of the Revised Code that charges the offender with having a firearm on or about the offender's person or under the offender's control while committing the offense and displaying the firearm, brandishing the firearm, indicating that the offender possessed the firearm, or using the firearm to facilitate the offense and that the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a specification of the type described in section 2941.141, 2941.144, 2941.145, 2941.146, or 2941.1412 of the Revised Code; (vi) A prison term of eighteen months if the specification is of the type described in division (D) of section 2941.141 of the Revised Code that charges the offender with having a firearm on or about the offender's person or under the offender's control while committing the offense and that the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a specification of the type described in section 2941.141, 2941.144, 2941.145, 2941.146, or 2941.1412 of the Revised Code. (b) If a court imposes a prison term on an offender under division (B)(1)(a) of this section, the prison term shall not be reduced pursuant to section 2929.20, division (A)(2) or (3) of section 2967.193 or 2967.194, or any other provision of Chapter 2967. or Chapter 5120. of the Revised Code. Except as provided in division (B)(1)(g) of this section, a court shall not impose more than one prison term on an offender under division (B)(1)(a) of this section for felonies committed as part of the same act or transaction. (c)(i) Except as provided in division (B)(1)(e) of this section, if an offender who is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violation of section 2923.161 of the Revised Code or to a felony that includes, as an essential element, purposely or knowingly causing or attempting to cause the death of or physical harm to another, also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a specification of the type described in division (A) of section 2941.146 of the Revised Code that charges the offender with committing the offense by discharging a firearm from a motor vehicle other than a manufactured home, the court, after imposing a prison term on the offender for the violation of section 2923.161 of the Revised Code or for the other felony offense under division (A), (B)(2), or (B)(3) of this section, shall impose an additional prison term of five years upon the offender that shall not be reduced pursuant to section 2929.20, division (A)(2) or (3) of section 2967.193 or 2967.194, or any other provision of Chapter 2967. or Chapter 5120. of the Revised Code. (ii) Except as provided in division (B)(1)(e) of this section, if an offender who is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violation of section 2923.161 of the Revised Code or to a felony that includes, as an essential element, purposely or knowingly causing or attempting to cause the death of or physical harm to another, also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a specification of the type described in division (C) of section 2941.146 of the Revised Code that charges the offender with committing the offense by discharging a firearm from a motor vehicle other than a manufactured home and that the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a specification of the type described in section 2941.141, 2941.144, 2941.145, 2941.146, or 2941.1412 of the Revised Code, the court, after imposing a prison term on the offender for the violation of section 2923.161 of the Revised Code or for the other felony offense under division (A), (B)(2), or (3) of this section, shall impose an additional prison term of ninety months upon the offender that shall not be reduced pursuant to section 2929.20, division (A)(2) or (3) of section 2967.193 or 2967.194, or any other provision of Chapter 2967. or Chapter 5120. of the Revised Code. (iii) A court shall not impose more than one additional prison term on an offender under division (B)(1)(c) of this section for felonies committed as part of the same act or transaction. If a court imposes an additional prison term on an offender under division (B)(1)(c) of this section relative to an offense, the court also shall impose a prison term under division (B)(1)(a) of this section relative to the same offense, provided the criteria specified in that division for imposing an additional prison term are satisfied relative to the offender and the offense. (d) If an offender who is convicted of or pleads guilty to an offense of violence that is a felony also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a specification of the type described in section 2941.1411 of the Revised Code that charges the offender with wearing or carrying body armor while committing the felony offense of violence, the court shall impose on the offender an additional prison term of two years. The prison term so imposed shall not be reduced pursuant to section 2929.20, division (A)(2) or (3) of section 2967.193 or 2967.194, or any other provision of Chapter 2967. or Chapter 5120. of the Revised Code. A court shall not impose more than one prison term on an offender under division (B)(1)(d) of this section for felonies committed as part of the same act or transaction. If a court imposes an additional prison term under division (B)(1)(a) or (c) of this section, the court is not precluded from imposing an additional prison term under division (B)(1)(d) of this section. (e) The court shall not impose any of the prison terms described in division (B)(1)(a) of this section or any of the additional prison terms described in division (B)(1)(c) of this section upon an offender for a violation of section 2923.12 or 2923.123 of the Revised Code. The court shall not impose any of the prison terms described in division (B)(1)(a) or (b) of this section upon an offender for a violation of section 2923.122 that involves a deadly weapon that is a firearm other than a dangerous ordnance, section 2923.16, or section 2923.121 of the Revised Code. The court shall not impose any of the prison terms described in division (B)(1)(a) of this section or any of the additional prison terms described in division (B)(1)(c) of this section upon an offender for a violation of section 2923.13 of the Revised Code unless all of the following apply: (i) The offender previously has been convicted of aggravated murder, murder, or any felony of the first or second degree. (ii) Less than five years have passed since the offender was released from prison or post-release control, whichever is later, for the prior offense. (f)(i) If an offender is convicted of or pleads guilty to a felony that includes, as an essential element, causing or attempting to cause the death of or physical harm to another and also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a specification of the type described in division (A) of section 2941.1412 of the Revised Code that charges the offender with committing the offense by discharging a firearm at a peace officer as defined in section 2935.01 of the Revised Code or a corrections officer, as defined in section 2941.1412 of the Revised Code, the court, after imposing a prison term on the offender for the felony offense under division (A), (B)(2), or (B)(3) of this section, shall impose an additional prison term of seven years upon the offender that shall not be reduced pursuant to section 2929.20, division (A)(2) or (3) of section 2967.193 or 2967.194, or any other provision of Chapter 2967. or Chapter 5120. of the Revised Code. (ii) If an offender is convicted of or pleads guilty to a felony that includes, as an essential element, causing or attempting to cause the death of or physical harm to another and also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a specification of the type described in division (B) of section 2941.1412 of the Revised Code that charges the offender with committing the offense by discharging a firearm at a peace officer, as defined in section 2935.01 of the Revised Code, or a corrections officer, as defined in section 2941.1412 of the Revised Code, and that the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a specification of the type described in section 2941.141, 2941.144, 2941.145, 2941.146, or 2941.1412 of the Revised Code, the court, after imposing a prison term on the offender for the felony offense under division (A), (B)(2), or (3) of this section, shall impose an additional prison term of one hundred twenty-six months upon the offender that shall not be reduced pursuant to section 2929.20, division (A)(2) or (3) of section 2967.193 or 2967.194, or any other provision of Chapter 2967. or 5120. of the Revised Code. (iii) If an offender is convicted of or pleads guilty to two or more felonies that include, as an essential element, causing or attempting to cause the death or physical harm to another and also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a specification of the type described under division (B)(1)(f) of this section in connection with two or more of the felonies of which the offender is convicted or to which the offender pleads guilty, the sentencing court shall impose on the offender the prison term specified under division (B)(1)(f) of this section for each of two of the specifications of which the offender is convicted or to which the offender pleads guilty and, in its discretion, also may impose on the offender the prison term specified under that division for any or all of the remaining specifications. If a court imposes an additional prison term on an offender under division (B)(1)(f) of this section relative to an offense, the court shall not impose a prison term under division (B)(1)(a) or (c) of this section relative to the same offense. (g) If an offender is convicted of or pleads guilty to two or more felonies, if one or more of those felonies are aggravated murder, murder, attempted aggravated murder, attempted murder, aggravated robbery, felonious assault, or rape, and if the offender is convicted of or pleads guilty to a specification of the type described under division (B)(1)(a) of this section in connection with two or more of the felonies, the sentencing court shall impose on the offender the prison term specified under division (B)(1)(a) of this section for each of the two most serious specifications of which the offender is convicted or to which the offender pleads guilty and, in its discretion, also may impose on the offender the prison term specified under that division for any or all of the remaining specifications. (2)(a) If division (B)(2)(b) of this section does not apply, the court may impose on an offender, in addition to the longest prison term authorized or required for the offense or, for offenses for which division (A)(1)(a) or (2)(a) of this section applies, in addition to the longest minimum prison term authorized or required for the offense, an additional definite prison term of one, two, three, four, five, six, seven, eight, nine, or ten years if all of the following criteria are met: (i) The offender is convicted of or pleads guilty to a specification of the type described in section 2941.149 of the Revised Code that the offender is a repeat violent offender. (ii) The offense of which the offender currently is convicted or to which the offender currently pleads guilty is aggravated murder and the court does not impose a sentence of death or life imprisonment without parole, murder, terrorism and the court does not impose a sentence of life imprisonment without parole, any felony of the first degree that is an offense of violence and the court does not impose a sentence of life imprisonment without parole, or any felony of the second degree that is an offense of violence and the trier of fact finds that the offense involved an attempt to cause or a threat to cause serious physical harm to a person or resulted in serious physical harm to a person. (iii) The court imposes the longest prison term for the offense or the longest minimum prison term for the offense, whichever is applicable, that is not life imprisonment without parole. (iv) The court finds that the prison terms imposed pursuant to division (B)(2)(a)(iii) of this section and, if applicable, division (B)(1) or (3) of this section are inadequate to punish the offender and protect the public from future crime, because the applicable factors under section 2929.12 of the Revised Code indicating a greater likelihood of recidivism outweigh the applicable factors under that section indicating a lesser likelihood of recidivism. (v) The court finds that the prison terms imposed pursuant to division (B)(2)(a)(iii) of this section and, if applicable, division (B)(1) or (3) of this section are demeaning to the seriousness of the offense, because one or more of the factors under section 2929.12 of the Revised Code indicating that the offender's conduct is more serious than conduct normally constituting the offense are present, and they outweigh the applicable factors under that section indicating that the offender's conduct is less serious than conduct normally constituting the offense. (b) The court shall impose on an offender the longest prison term authorized or required for the offense or, for offenses for which division (A)(1)(a) or (2)(a) of this section applies, the longest minimum prison term authorized or required for the offense, and shall impose on the offender an additional definite prison term of one, two, three, four, five, six, seven, eight, nine, or ten years if all of the following criteria are met: (i) The offender is convicted of or pleads guilty to a specification of the type described in section 2941.149 of the Revised Code that the offender is a repeat violent offender. (ii) The offender within the preceding twenty years has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to three or more offenses described in division (CC)(1) of section 2929.01 of the Revised Code, including all offenses described in that division of which the offender is convicted or to which the offender pleads guilty in the current prosecution and all offenses described in that division of which the offender previously has been convicted or to which the offender previously pleaded guilty, whether prosecuted together or separately. (iii) The offense or offenses of which the offender currently is convicted or to which the offender currently pleads guilty is aggravated murder and the court does not impose a sentence of death or life imprisonment without parole, murder, terrorism and the court does not impose a sentence of life imprisonment without parole, any felony of the first degree that is an offense of violence and the court does not impose a sentence of life imprisonment without parole, or any felony of the second degree that is an offense of violence and the trier of fact finds that the offense involved an attempt to cause or a threat to cause serious physical harm to a person or resulted in serious physical harm to a person. (c) For purposes of division (B)(2)(b) of this section, two or more offenses committed at the same time or as part of the same act or event shall be considered one offense, and that one offense shall be the offense with the greatest penalty. (d) A sentence imposed under division (B)(2)(a) or (b) of this section shall not be reduced pursuant to section 2929.20, division (A)(2) or (3) of section 2967.193 or 2967.194, or any other provision of Chapter 2967. or Chapter 5120. of the Revised Code. The offender shall serve an additional prison term imposed under division (B)(2)(a) or (b) of this section consecutively to and prior to the prison term imposed for the underlying offense. (e) When imposing a sentence pursuant to division (B)(2)(a) or (b) of this section, the court shall state its findings explaining the imposed sentence. (3) Except when an offender commits a violation of section 2903.01 or 2907.02 of the Revised Code and the penalty imposed for the violation is life imprisonment or commits a violation of section 2903.02 of the Revised Code, if the offender commits a violation of section 2925.03 or 2925.11 of the Revised Code and that section classifies the offender as a major drug offender, if the offender commits a violation of section 2925.05 of the Revised Code and division (E)(1) of that section classifies the offender as a major drug offender, if the offender commits a felony violation of section 2925.02, 2925.04, 2925.05, 2925.36, 3719.07, 3719.08, 3719.16, 3719.161, 4729.37, or 4729.61, division (C) or (D) of section 3719.172, division (E) of section 4729.51, or division (J) of section 4729.54 of the Revised Code that includes the sale, offer to sell, or possession of a schedule I or II controlled substance, with the exception of marihuana, and the court imposing sentence upon the offender finds that the offender is guilty of a specification of the type described in division (A) of section 2941.1410 of the Revised Code charging that the offender is a major drug offender, if the court imposing sentence upon an offender for a felony finds that the offender is guilty of corrupt activity with the most serious offense in the pattern of corrupt activity being a felony of the first degree, or if the offender is guilty of an attempted violation of section 2907.02 of the Revised Code and, had the offender completed the violation of section 2907.02 of the Revised Code that was attempted, the offender would have been subject to a sentence of life imprisonment or life imprisonment without parole for the violation of section 2907.02 of the Revised Code, the court shall impose upon the offender for the felony violation a mandatory prison term determined as described in this division that cannot be reduced pursuant to section 2929.20, division (A)(2) or (3) of section 2967.193 or 2967.194, or any other provision of Chapter 2967. or 5120. of the Revised Code. The mandatory prison term shall be the maximum definite prison term prescribed in division (A)(1)(b) of this section for a felony of the first degree, except that for offenses for which division (A)(1)(a) of this section applies, the mandatory prison term shall be the longest minimum prison term prescribed in that division for the offense. (4) If the offender is being sentenced for a third or fourth degree felony OVI offense under division (G)(2) of section 2929.13 of the Revised Code, the sentencing court shall impose upon the offender a mandatory prison term in accordance with that division. In addition to the mandatory prison term, if the offender is being sentenced for a fourth degree felony OVI offense, the court, notwithstanding division (A)(4) of this section, may sentence the offender to a definite prison term of not less than six months and not more than thirty months, and if the offender is being sentenced for a third degree felony OVI offense, the sentencing court may sentence the offender to an additional prison term of any duration specified in division (A)(3) of this section. In either case, the additional prison term imposed shall be reduced by the sixty or one hundred twenty days imposed upon the offender as the mandatory prison term. The total of the additional prison term imposed under division (B)(4) of this section plus the sixty or one hundred twenty days imposed as the mandatory prison term shall equal a definite term in the range of six months to thirty months for a fourth degree felony OVI offense and shall equal one of the authorized prison terms specified in division (A)(3) of this section for a third degree felony OVI offense. If the court imposes an additional prison term under division (B)(4) of this section, the offender shall serve the additional prison term after the offender has served the mandatory prison term required for the offense. In addition to the mandatory prison term or mandatory and additional prison term imposed as described in division (B)(4) of this section, the court also may sentence the offender to a community control sanction under section 2929.16 or 2929.17 of the Revised Code, but the offender shall serve all of the prison terms so imposed prior to serving the community control sanction. If the offender is being sentenced for a fourth degree felony OVI offense under division (G)(1) of section 2929.13 of the Revised Code and the court imposes a mandatory term of local incarceration, the court may impose a prison term as described in division (A)(1) of that section. (5) If an offender is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violation of division (A)(1) or (2) of section 2903.06 of the Revised Code and also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a specification of the type described in section 2941.1414 of the Revised Code that charges that the victim of the offense is a peace officer, as defined in section 2935.01 of the Revised Code, an investigator of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation, as defined in section 2903.11 of the Revised Code, or a firefighter or emergency medical worker, both as defined in section 2941.1414 of the Revised Code, the court shall impose on the offender a prison term of five years. If a court imposes a prison term on an offender under division (B)(5) of this section, the prison term shall not be reduced pursuant to section 2929.20, division (A)(2) or (3) of section 2967.193 or 2967.194, or any other provision of Chapter 2967. or Chapter 5120. of the Revised Code. A court shall not impose more than one prison term on an offender under division (B)(5) of this section for felonies committed as part of the same act. (6) If an offender is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violation of division (A)(1) or (2) of section 2903.06 of the Revised Code and also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a specification of the type described in section 2941.1415 of the Revised Code that charges that the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to three or more violations of division (A) of section 4511.19 of the Revised Code or an equivalent offense, as defined in section 2941.1415 of the Revised Code, or three or more violations of any combination of those offenses, the court shall impose on the offender a prison term of three years. If a court imposes a prison term on an offender under division (B)(6) of this section, the prison term shall not be reduced pursuant to section 2929.20, division (A)(2) or (3) of section 2967.193 or 2967.194, or any other provision of Chapter 2967. or Chapter 5120. of the Revised Code. A court shall not impose more than one prison term on an offender under division (B)(6) of this section for felonies committed as part of the same act. (7)(a) If an offender is convicted of or pleads guilty to a felony violation of section 2905.01, 2905.02, 2907.21, 2907.22, or 2923.32, division (A)(1) or (2) of section 2907.323 involving a minor, or division (B)(1), (2), (3), (4), or (5) of section 2919.22 of the Revised Code and also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a specification of the type described in section 2941.1422 of the Revised Code that charges that the offender knowingly committed the offense in furtherance of human trafficking, the court shall impose on the offender a mandatory prison term that is one of the following: (i) If the offense is a felony of the first degree, a definite prison term of not less than five years and not greater than eleven years, except that if the offense is a felony of the first degree committed on or after March 22, 2019, the court shall impose as the minimum prison term a mandatory term of not less than five years and not greater than eleven years; (ii) If the offense is a felony of the second or third degree, a definite prison term of not less than three years and not greater than the maximum prison term allowed for the offense by division (A)(2)(b) or (3) of this section, except that if the offense is a felony of the second degree committed on or after March 22, 2019, the court shall impose as the minimum prison term a mandatory term of not less than three years and not greater than eight years; (iii) If the offense is a felony of the fourth or fifth degree, a definite prison term that is the maximum prison term allowed for the offense by division (A) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code. (b) The prison term imposed under division (B)(7)(a) of this section shall not be reduced pursuant to section 2929.20, division (A)(2) or (3) of section 2967.193 or 2967.194, or any other provision of Chapter 2967. of the Revised Code. A court shall not impose more than one prison term on an offender under division (B)(7)(a) of this section for felonies committed as part of the same act, scheme, or plan. (8) If an offender is convicted of or pleads guilty to a felony violation of section 2903.11, 2903.12, or 2903.13 of the Revised Code and also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a specification of the type described in section 2941.1423 of the Revised Code that charges that the victim of the violation was a woman whom the offender knew was pregnant at the time of the violation, notwithstanding the range prescribed in division (A) of this section as the definite prison term or minimum prison term for felonies of the same degree as the violation, the court shall impose on the offender a mandatory prison term that is either a definite prison term of six months or one of the prison terms prescribed in division (A) of this section for felonies of the same degree as the violation, except that if the violation is a felony of the first or second degree committed on or after March 22, 2019, the court shall impose as the minimum prison term under division (A)(1)(a) or (2)(a) of this section a mandatory term that is one of the terms prescribed in that division, whichever is applicable, for the offense. (9)(a) If an offender is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violation of division (A)(1) or (2) of section 2903.11 of the Revised Code and also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a specification of the type described in section 2941.1425 of the Revised Code, the court shall impose on the offender a mandatory prison term of six years if either of the following applies: (i) The violation is a violation of division (A)(1) of section 2903.11 of the Revised Code and the specification charges that the offender used an accelerant in committing the violation and the serious physical harm to another or to another's unborn caused by the violation resulted in a permanent, serious disfigurement or permanent, substantial incapacity; (ii) The violation is a violation of division (A)(2) of section 2903.11 of the Revised Code and the specification charges that the offender used an accelerant in committing the violation, that the violation caused physical harm to another or to another's unborn, and that the physical harm resulted in a permanent, serious disfigurement or permanent, substantial incapacity. (b) If a court imposes a prison term on an offender under division (B)(9)(a) of this section, the prison term shall not be reduced pursuant to section 2929.20, division (A)(2) or (3) of section 2967.193 or 2967.194, or any other provision of Chapter 2967. or Chapter 5120. of the Revised Code. A court shall not impose more than one prison term on an offender under division (B)(9) of this section for felonies committed as part of the same act. (c) The provisions of divisions (B)(9) and (C)(6) of this section and of division (D)(2) of section 2903.11, division (F)(20) of section 2929.13, and section 2941.1425 of the Revised Code shall be known as "Judy's Law." (10) If an offender is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violation of division (A) of section 2903.11 of the Revised Code and also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a specification of the type described in section 2941.1426 of the Revised Code that charges that the victim of the offense suffered permanent disabling harm as a result of the offense and that the victim was under ten years of age at the time of the offense, regardless of whether the offender knew the age of the victim, the court shall impose upon the offender an additional definite prison term of six years. A prison term imposed on an offender under division (B)(10) of this section shall not be reduced pursuant to section 2929.20, division (A)(2) or (3) of section 2967.193 or 2967.194, or any other provision of Chapter 2967. or Chapter 5120. of the Revised Code. If a court imposes an additional prison term on an offender under this division relative to a violation of division (A) of section 2903.11 of the Revised Code, the court shall not impose any other additional prison term on the offender relative to the same offense. (11) If an offender is convicted of or pleads guilty to a felony violation of section 2925.03 or 2925.05 of the Revised Code or a felony violation of section 2925.11 of the Revised Code for which division (C)(11) of that section applies in determining the sentence for the violation, if the drug involved in the violation is a fentanyl-related compound or a compound, mixture, preparation, or substance containing a fentanyl-related compound, and if the offender also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a specification of the type described in division (B) of section 2941.1410 of the Revised Code that charges that the offender is a major drug offender, in addition to any other penalty imposed for the violation, the court shall impose on the offender a mandatory prison term of three, four, five, six, seven, or eight years. If a court imposes a prison term on an offender under division (B)(11) of this section, the prison term shall not be reduced pursuant to section 2929.20, division (A)(2) or (3) of section 2967.193 or 2967.194, or any other provision of Chapter 2967. or 5120. of the Revised Code. A court shall not impose more than one prison term on an offender under division (B)(11) of this section for felonies committed as part of the same act. (C)(1)(a) Subject to division (C)(1)(b) of this section, if a mandatory prison term is imposed upon an offender pursuant to division (B)(1)(a) of this section for having a firearm on or about the offender's person or under the offender's control while committing a felony, if a mandatory prison term is imposed upon an offender pursuant to division (B)(1)(c) of this section for committing a felony specified in that division by discharging a firearm from a motor vehicle, or if both types of mandatory prison terms are imposed, the offender shall serve any mandatory prison term imposed under either division consecutively to any other mandatory prison term imposed under either division or under division (B)(1)(d) of this section, consecutively to and prior to any prison term imposed for the underlying felony pursuant to division (A), (B)(2), or (B)(3) of this section or any other section of the Revised Code, and consecutively to any other prison term or mandatory prison term previously or subsequently imposed upon the offender. (b) If a mandatory prison term is imposed upon an offender pursuant to division (B)(1)(d) of this section for wearing or carrying body armor while committing an offense of violence that is a felony, the offender shall serve the mandatory term so imposed consecutively to any other mandatory prison term imposed under that division or under division (B)(1)(a) or (c) of this section, consecutively to and prior to any prison term imposed for the underlying felony under division (A), (B)(2), or (B)(3) of this section or any other section of the Revised Code, and consecutively to any other prison term or mandatory prison term previously or subsequently imposed upon the offender. (c) If a mandatory prison term is imposed upon an offender pursuant to division (B)(1)(f) of this section, the offender shall serve the mandatory prison term so imposed consecutively to and prior to any prison term imposed for the underlying felony under division (A), (B)(2), or (B)(3) of this section or any other section of the Revised Code, and consecutively to any other prison term or mandatory prison term previously or subsequently imposed upon the offender. (d) If a mandatory prison term is imposed upon an offender pursuant to division (B)(7) or (8) of this section, the offender shall serve the mandatory prison term so imposed consecutively to any other mandatory prison term imposed under that division or under any other provision of law and consecutively to any other prison term or mandatory prison term previously or subsequently imposed upon the offender. (e) If a mandatory prison term is imposed upon an offender pursuant to division (B)(11) of this section, the offender shall serve the mandatory prison term consecutively to any other mandatory prison term imposed under that division, consecutively to and prior to any prison term imposed for the underlying felony, and consecutively to any other prison term or mandatory prison term previously or subsequently imposed upon the offender. (2) If an offender who is an inmate in a jail, prison, or other residential detention facility violates section 2917.02, 2917.03, or 2921.35 of the Revised Code or division (A)(1) or (2) of section 2921.34 of the Revised Code, if an offender who is under detention at a detention facility commits a felony violation of section 2923.131 of the Revised Code, or if an offender who is an inmate in a jail, prison, or other residential detention facility or is under detention at a detention facility commits another felony while the offender is an escapee in violation of division (A)(1) or (2) of section 2921.34 of the Revised Code, any prison term imposed upon the offender for one of those violations shall be served by the offender consecutively to the prison term or term of imprisonment the offender was serving when the offender committed that offense and to any other prison term previously or subsequently imposed upon the offender. (3) If a prison term is imposed for a violation of division (B) of section 2911.01 of the Revised Code, a violation of division (A) of section 2913.02 of the Revised Code in which the stolen property is a firearm or dangerous ordnance, or a felony violation of division (B) of section 2921.331 of the Revised Code, the offender shall serve that prison term consecutively to any other prison term or mandatory prison term previously or subsequently imposed upon the offender. (4) If multiple prison terms are imposed on an offender for convictions of multiple offenses, the court may require the offender to serve the prison terms consecutively if the court finds that the consecutive service is necessary to protect the public from future crime or to punish the offender and that consecutive sentences are not disproportionate to the seriousness of the offender's conduct and to the danger the offender poses to the public, and if the court also finds any of the following: (a) The offender committed one or more of the multiple offenses while the offender was awaiting trial or sentencing, was under a sanction imposed pursuant to section 2929.16, 2929.17, or 2929.18 of the Revised Code, or was under post-release control for a prior offense. (b) At least two of the multiple offenses were committed as part of one or more courses of conduct, and the harm caused by two or more of the multiple offenses so committed was so great or unusual that no single prison term for any of the offenses committed as part of any of the courses of conduct adequately reflects the seriousness of the offender's conduct. (c) The offender's history of criminal conduct demonstrates that consecutive sentences are necessary to protect the public from future crime by the offender. (5) If a mandatory prison term is imposed upon an offender pursuant to division (B)(5) or (6) of this section, the offender shall serve the mandatory prison term consecutively to and prior to any prison term imposed for the underlying violation of division (A)(1) or (2) of section 2903.06 of the Revised Code pursuant to division (A) of this section or section 2929.142 of the Revised Code. If a mandatory prison term is imposed upon an offender pursuant to division (B)(5) of this section, and if a mandatory prison term also is imposed upon the offender pursuant to division (B)(6) of this section in relation to the same violation, the offender shall serve the mandatory prison term imposed pursuant to division (B)(5) of this section consecutively to and prior to the mandatory prison term imposed pursuant to division (B)(6) of this section and consecutively to and prior to any prison term imposed for the underlying violation of division (A)(1) or (2) of section 2903.06 of the Revised Code pursuant to division (A) of this section or section 2929.142 of the Revised Code. (6) If a mandatory prison term is imposed on an offender pursuant to division (B)(9) of this section, the offender shall serve the mandatory prison term consecutively to and prior to any prison term imposed for the underlying violation of division (A)(1) or (2) of section 2903.11 of the Revised Code and consecutively to and prior to any other prison term or mandatory prison term previously or subsequently imposed on the offender. (7) If a mandatory prison term is imposed on an offender pursuant to division (B)(10) of this section, the offender shall serve that mandatory prison term consecutively to and prior to any prison term imposed for the underlying felonious assault. Except as otherwise provided in division (C) of this section, any other prison term or mandatory prison term previously or subsequently imposed upon the offender may be served concurrently with, or consecutively to, the prison term imposed pursuant to division (B)(10) of this section. (8) Any prison term imposed for a violation of section 2903.04 of the Revised Code that is based on a violation of section 2925.03 or 2925.11 of the Revised Code or on a violation of section 2925.05 of the Revised Code that is not funding of marihuana trafficking shall run consecutively to any prison term imposed for the violation of section 2925.03 or 2925.11 of the Revised Code or for the violation of section 2925.05 of the Revised Code that is not funding of marihuana trafficking. (9) When consecutive prison terms are imposed pursuant to division (C)(1), (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (7), or (8) or division (H)(1) or (2) of this section, subject to division (C)(10) of this section, the term to be served is the aggregate of all of the terms so imposed. (10) When a court sentences an offender to a non-life felony indefinite prison term, any definite prison term or mandatory definite prison term previously or subsequently imposed on the offender in addition to that indefinite sentence that is required to be served consecutively to that indefinite sentence shall be served prior to the indefinite sentence. (11) If a court is sentencing an offender for a felony of the first or second degree, if division (A)(1)(a) or (2)(a) of this section applies with respect to the sentencing for the offense, and if the court is required under the Revised Code section that sets forth the offense or any other Revised Code provision to impose a mandatory prison term for the offense, the court shall impose the required mandatory prison term as the minimum term imposed under division (A)(1)(a) or (2)(a) of this section, whichever is applicable. (D)(1) If a court imposes a prison term, other than a term of life imprisonment, for a felony of the first degree, for a felony of the second degree, for a felony sex offense, or for a felony of the third degree that is an offense of violence and that is not a felony sex offense, it shall include in the sentence a requirement that the offender be subject to a period of post-release control after the offender's release from imprisonment, in accordance with section 2967.28 of the Revised Code. If a court imposes a sentence including a prison term of a type described in this division on or after July 11, 2006, the failure of a court to include a post-release control requirement in the sentence pursuant to this division does not negate, limit, or otherwise affect the mandatory period of post-release control that is required for the offender under division (B) of section 2967.28 of the Revised Code. Section 2929.191 of the Revised Code applies if, prior to July 11, 2006, a court imposed a sentence including a prison term of a type described in this division and failed to include in the sentence pursuant to this division a statement regarding post-release control. (2) If a court imposes a prison term for a felony of the third, fourth, or fifth degree that is not subject to division (D)(1) of this section, it shall include in the sentence a requirement that the offender be subject to a period of post-release control after the offender's release from imprisonment, in accordance with that division, if the parole board determines that a period of post-release control is necessary. Section 2929.191 of the Revised Code applies if, prior to July 11, 2006, a court imposed a sentence including a prison term of a type described in this division and failed to include in the sentence pursuant to this division a statement regarding post-release control. (E) The court shall impose sentence upon the offender in accordance with section 2971.03 of the Revised Code, and Chapter 2971. of the Revised Code applies regarding the prison term or term of life imprisonment without parole imposed upon the offender and the service of that term of imprisonment if any of the following apply: (1) A person is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violent sex offense or a designated homicide, assault, or kidnapping offense, and, in relation to that offense, the offender is adjudicated a sexually violent predator. (2) A person is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violation of division (A)(1)(b) of section 2907.02 of the Revised Code committed on or after January 2, 2007, and either the court does not impose a sentence of life without parole when authorized pursuant to division (B) of section 2907.02 of the Revised Code, or division (B) of section 2907.02 of the Revised Code provides that the court shall not sentence the offender pursuant to section 2971.03 of the Revised Code. (3) A person is convicted of or pleads guilty to attempted rape committed on or after January 2, 2007, and a specification of the type described in section 2941.1418, 2941.1419, or 2941.1420 of the Revised Code. (4) A person is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violation of section 2905.01 of the Revised Code committed on or after January 1, 2008, and that section requires the court to sentence the offender pursuant to section 2971.03 of the Revised Code. (5) A person is convicted of or pleads guilty to aggravated murder committed on or after January 1, 2008, and division (A)(2)(b)(ii) of section 2929.022, division (A)(1)(e), (C)(1)(a)(v), (C)(2)(a)(ii), (D)(2)(b), (D)(3)(a)(iv), or (E)(1)(a)(iv) of section 2929.03, or division (A) or (B) of section 2929.06 of the Revised Code requires the court to sentence the offender pursuant to division (B)(3) of section 2971.03 of the Revised Code. (6) A person is convicted of or pleads guilty to murder committed on or after January 1, 2008, and division (B)(2) of section 2929.02 of the Revised Code requires the court to sentence the offender pursuant to section 2971.03 of the Revised Code. (F) If a person who has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a felony is sentenced to a prison term or term of imprisonment under this section, sections 2929.02 to 2929.06 of the Revised Code, section 2929.142 of the Revised Code, section 2971.03 of the Revised Code, or any other provision of law, section 5120.163 of the Revised Code applies regarding the person while the person is confined in a state correctional institution. (G) If an offender who is convicted of or pleads guilty to a felony that is an offense of violence also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a specification of the type described in section 2941.142 of the Revised Code that charges the offender with having committed the felony while participating in a criminal gang, the court shall impose upon the offender an additional prison term of one, two, or three years. (H)(1) If an offender who is convicted of or pleads guilty to aggravated murder, murder, or a felony of the first, second, or third degree that is an offense of violence also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a specification of the type described in section 2941.143 of the Revised Code that charges the offender with having committed the offense in a school safety zone or towards a person in a school safety zone, the court shall impose upon the offender an additional prison term of two years. The offender shall serve the additional two years consecutively to and prior to the prison term imposed for the underlying offense. (2)(a) If an offender is convicted of or pleads guilty to a felony violation of section 2907.22, 2907.24, 2907.241, or 2907.25 of the Revised Code and to a specification of the type described in section 2941.1421 of the Revised Code and if the court imposes a prison term on the offender for the felony violation, the court may impose upon the offender an additional prison term as follows: (i) Subject to division (H)(2)(a)(ii) of this section, an additional prison term of one, two, three, four, five, or six months; (ii) If the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one or more felony or misdemeanor violations of section 2907.22, 2907.23, 2907.24, 2907.241, or 2907.25 of the Revised Code and also was convicted of or pleaded guilty to a specification of the type described in section 2941.1421 of the Revised Code regarding one or more of those violations, an additional prison term of one, two, three, four, five, six, seven, eight, nine, ten, eleven, or twelve months. (b) In lieu of imposing an additional prison term under division (H)(2)(a) of this section, the court may directly impose on the offender a sanction that requires the offender to wear a real-time processing, continual tracking electronic monitoring device during the period of time specified by the court. The period of time specified by the court shall equal the duration of an additional prison term that the court could have imposed upon the offender under division (H)(2)(a) of this section. A sanction imposed under this division shall commence on the date specified by the court, provided that the sanction shall not commence until after the offender has served the prison term imposed for the felony violation of section 2907.22, 2907.24, 2907.241, or 2907.25 of the Revised Code and any residential sanction imposed for the violation under section 2929.16 of the Revised Code. A sanction imposed under this division shall be considered to be a community control sanction for purposes of section 2929.15 of the Revised Code, and all provisions of the Revised Code that pertain to community control sanctions shall apply to a sanction imposed under this division, except to the extent that they would by their nature be clearly inapplicable. The offender shall pay all costs associated with a sanction imposed under this division, including the cost of the use of the monitoring device. (I) At the time of sentencing, the court may recommend the offender for placement in a program of shock incarceration under section 5120.031 of the Revised Code or for placement in an intensive program prison under section 5120.032 of the Revised Code, disapprove placement of the offender in a program of shock incarceration or an intensive program prison of that nature, or make no recommendation on placement of the offender. In no case shall the department of rehabilitation and correction place the offender in a program or prison of that nature unless the department determines as specified in section 5120.031 or 5120.032 of the Revised Code, whichever is applicable, that the offender is eligible for the placement. If the court disapproves placement of the offender in a program or prison of that nature, the department of rehabilitation and correction shall not place the offender in any program of shock incarceration or intensive program prison. If the court recommends placement of the offender in a program of shock incarceration or in an intensive program prison, and if the offender is subsequently placed in the recommended program or prison, the department shall notify the court of the placement and shall include with the notice a brief description of the placement. If the court recommends placement of the offender in a program of shock incarceration or in an intensive program prison and the department does not subsequently place the offender in the recommended program or prison, the department shall send a notice to the court indicating why the offender was not placed in the recommended program or prison. If the court does not make a recommendation under this division with respect to an offender and if the department determines as specified in section 5120.031 or 5120.032 of the Revised Code, whichever is applicable, that the offender is eligible for placement in a program or prison of that nature, the department shall screen the offender and determine if there is an available program of shock incarceration or an intensive program prison for which the offender is suited. If there is an available program of shock incarceration or an intensive program prison for which the offender is suited, the department shall notify the court of the proposed placement of the offender as specified in section 5120.031 or 5120.032 of the Revised Code and shall include with the notice a brief description of the placement. The court shall have ten days from receipt of the notice to disapprove the placement. (J) If a person is convicted of or pleads guilty to aggravated vehicular homicide in violation of division (A)(1) of section 2903.06 of the Revised Code and division (B)(2)(c) or (d) of that section applies, the person shall be sentenced pursuant to section 2929.142 of the Revised Code. (K)(1) The court shall impose an additional mandatory prison term of two, three, four, five, six, seven, eight, nine, ten, or eleven years on an offender who is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violent felony offense if the offender also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a specification of the type described in section 2941.1424 of the Revised Code that charges that the offender is a violent career criminal and had a firearm on or about the offender's person or under the offender's control while committing the presently charged violent felony offense and displayed or brandished the firearm, indicated that the offender possessed a firearm, or used the firearm to facilitate the offense. The offender shall serve the prison term imposed under this division consecutively to and prior to the prison term imposed for the underlying offense. The prison term shall not be reduced pursuant to section 2929.20, division (A)(2) or (3) of section 2967.193 or 2967.194, or any other provision of Chapter 2967. or 5120. of the Revised Code. A court may not impose more than one sentence under division (B)(2)(a) of this section and this division for acts committed as part of the same act or transaction. (2) As used in division (K)(1) of this section, "violent career criminal" and "violent felony offense" have the same meanings as in section 2923.132 of the Revised Code. (L) If an offender receives or received a sentence of life imprisonment without parole, a sentence of life imprisonment, a definite sentence, or a sentence to an indefinite prison term under this chapter for a felony offense that was committed when the offender was under eighteen years of age, the offender's parole eligibility shall be determined under section 2967.132 of the Revised Code. Sec. 2929.144. (A) As used in this section, "qualifying felony of the first or second degree" means a felony of the first or second degree committed on or after the effective date of this section. (B) The court imposing a an indefinite prison term on an offender under division (A)(1)(a) or (2)(a)(A) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code for a qualifying felony of the first or second degree shall determine the maximum prison term that is part of the sentence in accordance with the following: (1) If the offender is being sentenced for one felony and the felony is a qualifying a felony of the first or second degree, the maximum prison term shall be equal to the minimum term imposed on the offender under division (A)(1)(a) or (2)(a)(A) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code plus fifty per cent of that termfive years. (2) If the offender is being sentenced for more than one felony, if one or more of the felonies is a qualifying felony of the first or second degree, and if the court orders that some or all of the prison terms imposed are to be served consecutively, the court shall add all of the minimum terms imposed on the offender under division (A)(1)(a) or (2)(a) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code for a qualifying felony of the first or second degree that are to be served consecutively and all of the definite terms of the felonies that are not qualifying felonies of the first or second degree that are to be served consecutively, and the maximum term shall be equal to the total of those terms so added by the court minimum term imposed on the offender under division (A) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code plus fifty per cent of the longest minimum term or definite term for the most serious felony being sentencedthree years. (3)(3)(a) If the offender is being sentenced for more than one a felony, if one or more of the felonies is a qualifying felony of the first or second degree, and if the court orders that all of the prison terms imposed are to run concurrently of the third degree that is a violation of section 2903.06, 2903.08, 2907.03, 2907.04, 2907.05, 2907.321, 2907.322, 2907.323, 2919.25, or 3795.04 of the Revised Code, that is a violation of division (A) of section 4511.19 of the Revised Code if the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of division (A) of that section that was a felony, that is a violation of section 2911.02 or 2911.12 of the Revised Code if the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty in two or more separate proceedings to two or more violations of section 2911.01, 2911.02, 2911.11, or 2911.12 of the Revised Code, or that is a violation of division (B) of section 2921.331 of the Revised Code if division (C)(5) of that section applies, the maximum term shall be equal to the longest of the minimum terms term imposed on the offender under division (A)(1)(a) or (2)(a)(A) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code for a qualifying felony of the first or second degree for which the sentence is being imposed plus fifty per cent of the longest minimum term for the most serious qualifying felony being sentencedtwo years. (b) If the offender is being sentenced for a felony of the third degree that is not included in division (A)(3)(a) of this section, the maximum term shall be equal to the minimum term imposed on the offender under division (A) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code plus one or two years. (4) If the offender is being sentenced for a felony of the fourth or fifth degree, the maximum term shall be equal to the minimum term imposed on the offender under division (A) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code plus six months. (5)(a) If the offender is being sentenced for multiple felonies and the court orders that all of the prison terms are to run concurrently, the maximum term shall be equal to the longest of the minimum terms imposed on the offender under division (A) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code, plus the additional term imposed based on the degree of felony for the longest term in division (A)(1) to (4) of this section. (b) If the offender is being sentenced for multiple felonies and the court orders that some or all of the prison terms are to run consecutively, the maximum term shall be equal to the total of all of the minimum terms to be served consecutively, plus the additional term imposed based on the degree of felony for the longest term in division (A)(1) to (4) of this section. (6) Any mandatory prison term, or portion of a mandatory prison term, that is imposed or to be imposed on the offender under division (B), (G), or (H) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code or under any other provision of the Revised Code, with respect to a conviction of or plea of guilty to a specification, and that is in addition to the sentence imposed for the underlying offense is separate from the sentence being imposed for the qualifying first or second degree felony committed on or after the effective date of this section and shall not be considered or included in determining a maximum prison term for the offender under divisions (B)(1)(A)(1) to (3)(4) of this section. (C)(B) The court imposing a prison term on an offender pursuant to division (A)(1)(a) or (2)(a)(A) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code for a qualifying felony of the first or second degree shall sentence the offender, as part of the sentence, to the maximum prison term determined under division (B)(A) of this section. The court shall impose this maximum term at sentencing as part of the sentence it imposes under section 2929.14 of the Revised Code, and shall state the minimum term it imposes under division (A)(1)(a) or (2)(a)(A) of that section, and this maximum term, in the sentencing entry. (D)(C) If a court imposes a prison term on an offender pursuant to division (A)(1)(a) or (2)(a)(A) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code for a qualifying felony of the first or second degree, section 2967.271 of the Revised Code applies with respect to the offender's service of the prison term. Sec. 2929.19. (A) The court shall hold a sentencing hearing before imposing a sentence under this chapter upon an offender who was convicted of or pleaded guilty to a felony and before resentencing an offender who was convicted of or pleaded guilty to a felony and whose case was remanded pursuant to section 2953.07 or 2953.08 of the Revised Code. At the hearing, the offender, the prosecuting attorney, the victim or the victim's representative in accordance with section 2930.14 of the Revised Code, and, with the approval of the court, any other person may present information relevant to the imposition of sentence in the case. The court shall inform the offender of the verdict of the jury or finding of the court and ask the offender whether the offender has anything to say as to why sentence should not be imposed upon the offender. (B)(1) At the sentencing hearing, the court, before imposing sentence, shall do all of the following: (a) Consider the record, any information presented at the hearing by any person pursuant to division (A) of this section, and, if one was prepared, the presentence investigation report made pursuant to section 2951.03 of the Revised Code or Criminal Rule 32.2, and any victim impact statement made pursuant to section 2947.051 of the Revised Code; (b) If the offense was committed when the offender was under eighteen years of age, in addition to other factors considered, consider youth and its characteristics as mitigating factors, including: (i) The chronological age of the offender at the time of the offense and that age's hallmark features, including intellectual capacity, immaturity, impetuosity, and a failure to appreciate risks and consequences; (ii) The family and home environment of the offender at the time of the offense, the offender's inability to control the offender's surroundings, a history of trauma regarding the offender, and the offender's school and special education history; (iii) The circumstances of the offense, including the extent of the offender's participation in the conduct and the way familial and peer pressures may have impacted the offender's conduct; (iv) Whether the offender might have been charged and convicted of a lesser offense if not for the incompetencies associated with youth, such as the offender's inability to deal with police officers and prosecutors during the offender's interrogation or possible plea agreement or the offender's inability to assist the offender's own attorney; (v) Examples of the offender's rehabilitation, including any subsequent growth or increase in maturity during confinement. (2) Subject to division (B)(3) of this section, if the sentencing court determines at the sentencing hearing that a prison term is necessary or required, the court shall do all of the following: (a) Impose a stated prison term and, if the court imposes a mandatory prison term, notify the offender that the prison term is a mandatory prison term; (b) In addition to any other information, include in the sentencing entry the name and section reference to the offense or offenses, the sentence or sentences imposed and whether the sentence or sentences contain mandatory prison terms, if sentences are imposed for multiple counts whether the sentences are to be served concurrently or consecutively, and the name and section reference of any specification or specifications for which sentence is imposed and the sentence or sentences imposed for the specification or specifications; (c) If the prison term is a non-life felony indefinite prison term, notify the offender of all of the following: (i) That it is rebuttably presumed that the offender will be released from service of the sentence on the expiration of the minimum prison term imposed as part of the sentence or on the offender's presumptive earned early release date, as defined in section 2967.271 of the Revised Code, whichever is earlier; (ii) That the department of rehabilitation and correction may rebut the presumption described in division (B)(2)(c)(i) of this section if, at a hearing held under section 2967.271 of the Revised Code, the department makes specified determinations regarding the offender's conduct while confined, the offender's rehabilitation, the offender's threat to society, the offender's restrictive housing, if any, while confined, and the offender's security classification; (iii) That if, as described in division (B)(2)(c)(ii) of this section, the department at the hearing makes the specified determinations and rebuts the presumption, the department may maintain the offender's incarceration after the expiration of that minimum term or after that presumptive earned early release date for the length of time the department determines to be reasonable, subject to the limitation specified in section 2967.271 of the Revised Code; (iv) That the department may make the specified determinations and maintain the offender's incarceration under the provisions described in divisions (B)(2)(c)(i) and (ii) of this section more than one time, subject to the limitation specified in section 2967.271 of the Revised Code; (v) That if the offender has not been released prior to the expiration of the offender's maximum prison term imposed as part of the sentence, the offender must be released upon the expiration of that term. (d) Notify the offender that the offender will be supervised under section 2967.28 of the Revised Code after the offender leaves prison if the offender is being sentenced, other than to a sentence of life imprisonment, for a felony of the first degree or second degree, for a felony sex offense, or for a felony of the third degree that is an offense of violence and is not a felony sex offense. This division applies with respect to all prison terms imposed for an offense of a type described in this division, including a non-life felony indefinite prison term and including a term imposed for any offense of a type described in this division that is a risk reduction sentence, as defined in section 2967.28 of the Revised Code. If a court imposes a sentence including a prison term of a type described in division (B)(2)(d) of this section on or after July 11, 2006, the failure of a court to notify the offender pursuant to division (B)(2)(d) of this section that the offender will be supervised under section 2967.28 of the Revised Code after the offender leaves prison or to include in the judgment of conviction entered on the journal a statement to that effect does not negate, limit, or otherwise affect the mandatory period of supervision that is required for the offender under division (B) of section 2967.28 of the Revised Code. Section 2929.191 of the Revised Code applies if, prior to July 11, 2006, a court imposed a sentence including a prison term of a type described in division (B)(2)(d) of this section and failed to notify the offender pursuant to division (B)(2)(d) of this section regarding post-release control or to include in the judgment of conviction entered on the journal or in the sentence a statement regarding post-release control. (e) Notify the offender that the offender may be supervised under section 2967.28 of the Revised Code after the offender leaves prison if the offender is being sentenced for a felony of the third, fourth, or fifth degree that is not subject to division (B)(2)(d) of this section. This division applies with respect to all prison terms imposed for an offense of a type described in this division, including a term imposed for any such offense that is a risk reduction sentence, as defined in section 2967.28 of the Revised Code. Section 2929.191 of the Revised Code applies if, prior to July 11, 2006, a court imposed a sentence including a prison term of a type described in division (B)(2)(e) of this section and failed to notify the offender pursuant to division (B)(2)(e) of this section regarding post-release control or to include in the judgment of conviction entered on the journal or in the sentence a statement regarding post-release control. (f) Notify the offender that, if a period of supervision is imposed following the offender's release from prison, as described in division (B)(2)(d) or (e) of this section, and if the offender violates that supervision or a condition of post-release control imposed under division (B) of section 2967.131 of the Revised Code, the parole board may impose a prison term, as part of the sentence, of up to one-half of the definite prison term originally imposed upon the offender as the offender's stated prison term or up to one-half of the minimum prison term originally imposed upon the offender as part of the offender's stated non-life felony indefinite prison term. If a court imposes a sentence including a prison term on or after July 11, 2006, the failure of a court to notify the offender pursuant to division (B)(2)(f) of this section that the parole board may impose a prison term as described in division (B)(2)(f) of this section for a violation of that supervision or a condition of post-release control imposed under division (B) of section 2967.131 of the Revised Code or to include in the judgment of conviction entered on the journal a statement to that effect does not negate, limit, or otherwise affect the authority of the parole board to so impose a prison term for a violation of that nature if, pursuant to division (D)(1) of section 2967.28 of the Revised Code, the parole board notifies the offender prior to the offender's release of the board's authority to so impose a prison term. Section 2929.191 of the Revised Code applies if, prior to July 11, 2006, a court imposed a sentence including a prison term and failed to notify the offender pursuant to division (B)(2)(f) of this section regarding the possibility of the parole board imposing a prison term for a violation of supervision or a condition of post-release control. (g)(i) Determine, notify the offender of, and include in the sentencing entry the total number of days, including the sentencing date but excluding conveyance time, that the offender has been confined for any reason arising out of the offense for which the offender is being sentenced and by which the department of rehabilitation and correction must reduce the definite prison term imposed on the offender as the offender's stated prison term or, if the offense is an offense for which a non-life felony indefinite prison term is imposed under division (A)(1)(a) or (2)(a)(A) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code, the minimum and maximum prison terms imposed on the offender as part of that non-life felony indefinite prison term, under section 2967.191 of the Revised Code. The court's calculation shall not include the number of days, if any, that the offender served in the custody of the department of rehabilitation and correction arising out of any prior offense for which the prisoner was convicted and sentenced. (ii) In making a determination under division (B)(2)(g)(i) of this section, the court shall consider the arguments of the parties and conduct a hearing if one is requested. (iii) The sentencing court retains continuing jurisdiction to correct any error not previously raised at sentencing in making a determination under division (B)(2)(g)(i) of this section. The offender may, at any time after sentencing, file a motion in the sentencing court to correct any error made in making a determination under division (B)(2)(g)(i) of this section, and the court may in its discretion grant or deny that motion. If the court changes the number of days in its determination or redetermination, the court shall cause the entry granting that change to be delivered to the department of rehabilitation and correction without delay. Sections 2931.15 and 2953.21 of the Revised Code do not apply to a motion made under this section. (iv) An inaccurate determination under division (B)(2)(g)(i) of this section is not grounds for setting aside the offender's conviction or sentence and does not otherwise render the sentence void or voidable. (v) The department of rehabilitation and correction shall rely upon the latest journal entry of the court in determining the total days of local confinement for purposes of division (B)(2)(g)(i) to (iii) of this section and section 2967.191 of the Revised Code. (3)(a) The court shall include in the offender's sentence a statement that the offender is a tier III sex offender/child-victim offender, and the court shall comply with the requirements of section 2950.03 of the Revised Code if any of the following apply: (i) The offender is being sentenced for a violent sex offense or designated homicide, assault, or kidnapping offense that the offender committed on or after January 1, 1997, and the offender is adjudicated a sexually violent predator in relation to that offense. (ii) The offender is being sentenced for a sexually oriented offense that the offender committed on or after January 1, 1997, and the offender is a tier III sex offender/child-victim offender relative to that offense. (iii) The offender is being sentenced on or after July 31, 2003, for a child-victim oriented offense, and the offender is a tier III sex offender/child-victim offender relative to that offense. (iv) The offender is being sentenced under section 2971.03 of the Revised Code for a violation of division (A)(1)(b) of section 2907.02 of the Revised Code committed on or after January 2, 2007. (v) The offender is sentenced to a term of life without parole under division (B) of section 2907.02 of the Revised Code. (vi) The offender is being sentenced for attempted rape committed on or after January 2, 2007, and a specification of the type described in section 2941.1418, 2941.1419, or 2941.1420 of the Revised Code. (vii) The offender is being sentenced under division (B)(3)(a), (b), (c), or (d) of section 2971.03 of the Revised Code for an offense described in those divisions committed on or after January 1, 2008. (b) Additionally, if any criterion set forth in divisions (B)(3)(a)(i) to (vii) of this section is satisfied, in the circumstances described in division (E) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code, the court shall impose sentence on the offender as described in that division. (4) If the sentencing court determines at the sentencing hearing that a community control sanction should be imposed and the court is not prohibited from imposing a community control sanction, the court shall impose a community control sanction. The court shall notify the offender that, if the conditions of the sanction are violated, if the offender commits a violation of any law, or if the offender leaves this state without the permission of the court or the offender's probation officer, the court may impose a longer time under the same sanction, may impose a more restrictive sanction, or may impose a prison term on the offender and shall indicate the range from which the prison term may be imposed as a sanction for the violation, which shall be the range of prison terms for the offense that is specified pursuant to section 2929.14 of the Revised Code and as described in section 2929.15 of the Revised Code." (5) Before imposing a financial sanction under section 2929.18 of the Revised Code or a fine under section 2929.32 of the Revised Code, the court shall consider the offender's present and future ability to pay the amount of the sanction or fine. (6) If the sentencing court sentences the offender to a sanction of confinement pursuant to section 2929.14 or 2929.16 of the Revised Code that is to be served in a local detention facility, as defined in section 2929.36 of the Revised Code, and if the local detention facility is covered by a policy adopted pursuant to section 307.93, 341.14, 341.19, 341.21, 341.23, 753.02, 753.04, 753.16, 2301.56, or 2947.19 of the Revised Code and section 2929.37 of the Revised Code, both of the following apply: (a) The court shall specify both of the following as part of the sentence: (i) If the offender is presented with an itemized bill pursuant to section 2929.37 of the Revised Code for payment of the costs of confinement, the offender is required to pay the bill in accordance with that section. (ii) If the offender does not dispute the bill described in division (B)(6)(a)(i) of this section and does not pay the bill by the times specified in section 2929.37 of the Revised Code, the clerk of the court may issue a certificate of judgment against the offender as described in that section. (b) The sentence automatically includes any certificate of judgment issued as described in division (B)(6)(a)(ii) of this section. (7) The failure of the court to notify the offender that a prison term is a mandatory prison term pursuant to division (B)(2)(a) of this section or to include in the sentencing entry any information required by division (B)(2)(b) of this section does not affect the validity of the imposed sentence or sentences. If the sentencing court notifies the offender at the sentencing hearing that a prison term is mandatory but the sentencing entry does not specify that the prison term is mandatory, the court may complete a corrected journal entry and send copies of the corrected entry to the offender and the department of rehabilitation and correction, or, at the request of the state, the court shall complete a corrected journal entry and send copies of the corrected entry to the offender and department of rehabilitation and correction. (C)(1) If the offender is being sentenced for a fourth degree felony OVI offense under division (G)(1) of section 2929.13 of the Revised Code, the court shall impose the mandatory term of local incarceration in accordance with that division, shall impose a mandatory fine in accordance with division (B)(3) of section 2929.18 of the Revised Code, and, in addition, may impose additional sanctions as specified in sections 2929.15, 2929.16, 2929.17, and 2929.18 of the Revised Code. The court shall not impose a prison term on the offender except that the court may impose a prison term upon the offender as provided in division (A)(1) of section 2929.13 of the Revised Code. (2) If the offender is being sentenced for a third or fourth degree felony OVI offense under division (G)(2) of section 2929.13 of the Revised Code, the court shall impose the mandatory prison term in accordance with that division, shall impose a mandatory fine in accordance with division (B)(3) of section 2929.18 of the Revised Code, and, in addition, may impose an additional prison term as specified in section 2929.14 of the Revised Code. In addition to the mandatory prison term or mandatory prison term and additional prison term the court imposes, the court also may impose a community control sanction on the offender, but the offender shall serve all of the prison terms so imposed prior to serving the community control sanction. (D) The sentencing court, pursuant to division (I)(1) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code, may recommend placement of the offender in a program of shock incarceration under section 5120.031 of the Revised Code or an intensive program prison under section 5120.032 of the Revised Code, disapprove placement of the offender in a program or prison of that nature, or make no recommendation. If the court recommends or disapproves placement, it shall make a finding that gives its reasons for its recommendation or disapproval. Sec. 2953.08. (A) In addition to any other right to appeal and except as provided in division (D) of this section, a defendant who is convicted of or pleads guilty to a felony may appeal as a matter of right the sentence imposed upon the defendant on one of the following grounds: (1) The sentence consisted of or included the maximum definite prison term allowed for the offense by division (A) of section 2929.14 or section 2929.142 of the Revised Code or, with respect to a non-life felony indefinite prison term, the longest minimum prison term allowed for the offense by division (A)(1)(a) or (2)(a)(A) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code, the maximum definite prison term or longest minimum prison term was not required for the offense pursuant to Chapter 2925. or any other provision of the Revised Code, and the court imposed the sentence under one of the following circumstances: (a) The sentence was imposed for only one offense. (b) The sentence was imposed for two or more offenses arising out of a single incident, and the court imposed the maximum definite prison term or longest minimum prison term for the offense of the highest degree. (2) The sentence consisted of or included a prison term and the offense for which it was imposed is a felony of the fourth or fifth degree or is a felony drug offense that is a violation of a provision of Chapter 2925. of the Revised Code and that is specified as being subject to division (B) of section 2929.13 of the Revised Code for purposes of sentencing. If the court specifies that it found one or more of the factors in division (B)(1)(b) of section 2929.13 of the Revised Code to apply relative to the defendant, the defendant is not entitled under this division to appeal as a matter of right the sentence imposed upon the offender. (3) The person was convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violent sex offense or a designated homicide, assault, or kidnapping offense, was adjudicated a sexually violent predator in relation to that offense, and was sentenced pursuant to division (A)(3) of section 2971.03 of the Revised Code, if the minimum term of the indefinite term imposed pursuant to division (A)(3) of section 2971.03 of the Revised Code is the longest term available for the offense from among the range of definite terms listed in section 2929.14 of the Revised Code or, with respect to a non-life felony indefinite prison term, the longest minimum prison term allowed for the offense by division (A)(1)(a) or (2)(a)(A) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code. As used in this division, "designated homicide, assault, or kidnapping offense" and "violent sex offense" have the same meanings as in section 2971.01 of the Revised Code. As used in this division, "adjudicated a sexually violent predator" has the same meaning as in section 2929.01 of the Revised Code, and a person is "adjudicated a sexually violent predator" in the same manner and the same circumstances as are described in that section. (4) The sentence is contrary to law. (5) The sentence consisted of an additional prison term of ten years imposed pursuant to division (B)(2)(a) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code. (B) In addition to any other right to appeal and except as provided in division (D) of this section, a prosecuting attorney, a city director of law, village solicitor, or similar chief legal officer of a municipal corporation, or the attorney general, if one of those persons prosecuted the case, may appeal as a matter of right a sentence imposed upon a defendant who is convicted of or pleads guilty to a felony or, in the circumstances described in division (B)(3) of this section the modification of a sentence imposed upon such a defendant, on any of the following grounds: (1) The sentence did not include a prison term despite a presumption favoring a prison term for the offense for which it was imposed, as set forth in section 2929.13 or Chapter 2925. of the Revised Code. (2) The sentence is contrary to law. (3) The sentence is a modification under section 2929.20 of the Revised Code of a sentence that was imposed for a felony of the first or second degree. (C)(1) In addition to the right to appeal a sentence granted under division (A) or (B) of this section, a defendant who is convicted of or pleads guilty to a felony may seek leave to appeal a sentence imposed upon the defendant on the basis that the sentencing judge has imposed consecutive sentences under division (C)(3) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code and that the consecutive sentences exceed the maximum definite prison term allowed by division (A) of that section for the most serious offense of which the defendant was convicted or, with respect to a non-life felony indefinite prison term, exceed the longest minimum prison term allowed by division (A)(1)(a) or (2)(a)(A) of that section for the most serious such offense. Upon the filing of a motion under this division, the court of appeals may grant leave to appeal the sentence if the court determines that the allegation included as the basis of the motion is true. (2) A defendant may seek leave to appeal an additional sentence imposed upon the defendant pursuant to division (B)(2)(a) or (b) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code if the additional sentence is for a definite prison term that is longer than five years. (D)(1) A sentence imposed upon a defendant is not subject to review under this section if the sentence is authorized by law, has been recommended jointly by the defendant and the prosecution in the case, and is imposed by a sentencing judge. (2) Except as provided in division (C)(2) of this section, a sentence imposed upon a defendant is not subject to review under this section if the sentence is imposed pursuant to division (B)(2)(b) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code. Except as otherwise provided in this division, a defendant retains all rights to appeal as provided under this chapter or any other provision of the Revised Code. A defendant has the right to appeal under this chapter or any other provision of the Revised Code the court's application of division (B)(2)(c) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code. (3) A sentence imposed for aggravated murder or murder pursuant to sections 2929.02 to 2929.06 of the Revised Code is not subject to review under this section. (E) A defendant, prosecuting attorney, city director of law, village solicitor, or chief municipal legal officer shall file an appeal of a sentence under this section to a court of appeals within the time limits specified in Rule 4(B) of the Rules of Appellate Procedure, provided that if the appeal is pursuant to division (B)(3) of this section, the time limits specified in that rule shall not commence running until the court grants the motion that makes the sentence modification in question. A sentence appeal under this section shall be consolidated with any other appeal in the case. If no other appeal is filed, the court of appeals may review only the portions of the trial record that pertain to sentencing. (F) On the appeal of a sentence under this section, the record to be reviewed shall include all of the following, as applicable: (1) Any presentence, psychiatric, or other investigative report that was submitted to the court in writing before the sentence was imposed. An appellate court that reviews a presentence investigation report prepared pursuant to section 2947.06 or 2951.03 of the Revised Code or Criminal Rule 32.2 in connection with the appeal of a sentence under this section shall comply with division (D)(3) of section 2951.03 of the Revised Code when the appellate court is not using the presentence investigation report, and the appellate court's use of a presentence investigation report of that nature in connection with the appeal of a sentence under this section does not affect the otherwise confidential character of the contents of that report as described in division (D)(1) of section 2951.03 of the Revised Code and does not cause that report to become a public record, as defined in section 149.43 of the Revised Code, following the appellate court's use of the report. (2) The trial record in the case in which the sentence was imposed; (3) Any oral or written statements made to or by the court at the sentencing hearing at which the sentence was imposed; (4) Any written findings that the court was required to make in connection with the modification of the sentence pursuant to a judicial release under division (I) of section 2929.20 of the Revised Code. (G)(1) If the sentencing court was required to make the findings required by division (B) or (D) of section 2929.13 or division (I) of section 2929.20 of the Revised Code, or to state the findings of the trier of fact required by division (B)(2)(e) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code, relative to the imposition or modification of the sentence, and if the sentencing court failed to state the required findings on the record, the court hearing an appeal under division (A), (B), or (C) of this section shall remand the case to the sentencing court and instruct the sentencing court to state, on the record, the required findings. (2) The court hearing an appeal under division (A), (B), or (C) of this section shall review the record, including the findings underlying the sentence or modification given by the sentencing court. The appellate court may increase, reduce, or otherwise modify a sentence that is appealed under this section or may vacate the sentence and remand the matter to the sentencing court for resentencing. The appellate court's standard for review is not whether the sentencing court abused its discretion. The appellate court may take any action authorized by this division if it clearly and convincingly finds either of the following: (a) That the record does not support the sentencing court's findings under division (B) or (D) of section 2929.13, division (B)(2)(e) or (C)(4) of section 2929.14, or division (I) of section 2929.20 of the Revised Code, whichever, if any, is relevant; (b) That the sentence is otherwise contrary to law. (H) A judgment or final order of a court of appeals under this section may be appealed, by leave of court, to the supreme court. (I) As used in this section, "non-life felony indefinite prison term" has the same meaning as in section 2929.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 2967.193. (A)(1) The provisions of this section apply until April 4, 2024, to persons confined in a state correctional institution or in the substance use disorder treatment program. On and after April 4, 2024, the provisions of section 2967.194 of the Revised Code apply to persons so confined, in the manner specified in division (G) of that section. (2) Except as provided in division (C) of this section and subject to the maximum aggregate total specified in division (A)(4) of this section, a person confined in a state correctional institution or placed in the substance use disorder treatment program may provisionally earn one day or five days of credit, based on the category set forth in division (D)(1), (2), (3), (4), or (5) of this section in which the person is included, toward satisfaction of the person's stated prison term, as described in division (F) of this section, for each completed month during which the person, if confined in a state correctional institution, productively participates in an education program, vocational training, employment in prison industries, treatment for substance abuse, or any other constructive program developed by the department of rehabilitation and correction with specific standards for performance by prisoners or during which the person, if placed in the substance use disorder treatment program, productively participates in the program. Except as provided in division (C) of this section and subject to the maximum aggregate total specified in division (A)(4) of this section, a person so confined in a state correctional institution who successfully completes two programs or activities of that type may, in addition, provisionally earn up to five days of credit toward satisfaction of the person's stated prison term, as described in division (F) of this section, for the successful completion of the second program or activity. The person shall not be awarded any provisional days of credit for the successful completion of the first program or activity or for the successful completion of any program or activity that is completed after the second program or activity. At the end of each calendar month in which a person productively participates in a program or activity listed in this division or successfully completes a program or activity listed in this division, the department of rehabilitation and correction shall determine and record the total number of days credit that the person provisionally earned in that calendar month. If the person in a state correctional institution violates prison rules or the person in the substance use disorder treatment program violates program or department rules, the department may deny the person a credit that otherwise could have been provisionally awarded to the person or may withdraw one or more credits previously provisionally earned by the person. Days of credit provisionally earned by a person shall be finalized and awarded by the department subject to administrative review by the department of the person's conduct. (3) Unless a person is serving a mandatory prison term or a prison term for an offense of violence or a sexually oriented offense, and notwithstanding the maximum aggregate total specified in division (A)(4) of this section, a person who successfully completes any of the following shall earn ninety days of credit toward satisfaction of the person's stated prison term or a ten per cent reduction of the person's stated prison term, whichever is less: (a) An Ohio high school diploma or Ohio certificate of high school equivalence certified by the Ohio central school system; (b) A therapeutic drug community program; (c) All three phases of the department of rehabilitation and correction's intensive outpatient drug treatment program; (d) A career technical vocational school program; (e) A college certification program; (f) The criteria for a certificate of achievement and employability as specified in division (A)(1) of section 2961.22 of the Revised Code. (4)(a) Except for persons described in division (A)(3) of this section and subject to division (A)(4)(b) of this section, the aggregate days of credit provisionally earned by a person for program or activity participation and program and activity completion under this section and the aggregate days of credit finally credited to a person under this section shall not exceed eight per cent of the total number of days in the person's stated prison term. (b) If a person is confined in a state correctional institution or in the substance use disorder treatment program after the effective date of this amendment October 3, 2023, and if the person as of that effective date October 3, 2023, has met the eight per cent limit specified in division (A)(4)(a) of this section or the person meets that eight per cent limit between that effective date October 3, 2023, and April 3, 2024, both of the following apply with respect to the person: (i) On and after the effective date of this amendment October 3, 2023, the eight per cent limit specified in division (A)(4)(a) of this section no longer applies to the person; (ii) On and after the effective date of this amendment October 3, 2023, the aggregate days of credit provisionally earned by a person for program or activity participation and program and activity completion under this section and the aggregate days of credit finally credited to a person under this section shall not exceed fifteen per cent of the total number of days in the person's stated prison term. (B) The department of rehabilitation and correction shall adopt rules that specify the programs or activities for which credit may be earned under this section, the criteria for determining productive participation in, or completion of, the programs or activities and the criteria for awarding credit, including criteria for awarding additional credit for successful program or activity completion, and the criteria for denying or withdrawing previously provisionally earned credit as a result of a violation of prison rules, or program or department rules, whichever is applicable. (C) No person confined in a state correctional institution or placed in a substance use disorder treatment program to whom any of the following applies shall be awarded any days of credit under division (A) of this section: (1) The person is serving a prison term that section 2929.13 or section 2929.14 of the Revised Code specifies cannot be reduced pursuant to this section or this chapter or is serving a sentence for which section 2967.13 or division (B) of section 2929.143 of the Revised Code specifies that the person is not entitled to any earned credit under this section. (2) The person is sentenced to death or is serving a prison term or a term of life imprisonment for aggravated murder, murder, or a conspiracy or attempt to commit, or complicity in committing, aggravated murder or murder. (3) The person is serving a sentence of life imprisonment without parole imposed pursuant to section 2929.03 or 2929.06 of the Revised Code, a prison term or a term of life imprisonment without parole imposed pursuant to section 2971.03 of the Revised Code, or a sentence for a sexually oriented offense that was committed on or after September 30, 2011. (D) This division does not apply to a determination of whether a person confined in a state correctional institution or placed in a substance use disorder treatment program may earn any days of credit under division (A) of this section for successful completion of a second program or activity. The determination of whether a person confined in a state correctional institution may earn one day of credit or five days of credit under division (A) of this section for each completed month during which the person productively participates in a program or activity specified under that division shall be made in accordance with the following: (1) The offender may earn one day of credit under division (A) of this section, except as provided in division (C) of this section, if the most serious offense for which the offender is confined is any of the following that is a felony of the first or second degree: (a) A violation of division (A) of section 2903.04 or of section 2903.03, 2903.11, 2903.15, 2905.01, 2907.24, 2907.25, 2909.02, 2909.09, 2909.10, 2909.101, 2909.26, 2909.27, 2909.29, 2911.01, 2911.02, 2911.11, 2911.12, 2919.13, 2919.15, 2919.151, 2919.22, 2921.34, 2923.01, 2923.131, 2923.162, 2923.32, 2925.24, or 2927.24 of the Revised Code; (b) A conspiracy or attempt to commit, or complicity in committing, any other offense for which the maximum penalty is imprisonment for life or any offense listed in division (D)(1)(a) of this section. (2) The offender may earn one day of credit under division (A) of this section, except as provided in division (C) of this section, if the offender is serving a stated prison term that includes a prison term imposed for a sexually oriented offense that the offender committed prior to September 30, 2011. (3) The offender may earn one day of credit under division (A) of this section, except as provided in division (C) of this section, if the offender is serving a stated prison term that includes a prison term imposed for a felony other than carrying a concealed weapon an essential element of which is any conduct or failure to act expressly involving any deadly weapon or dangerous ordnance. (4) Except as provided in division (C) of this section, if the most serious offense for which the offender is confined is a felony of the first or second degree and divisions (D)(1), (2), and (3) of this section do not apply to the offender, the offender may earn one day of credit under division (A) of this section if the offender committed that offense prior to September 30, 2011, and the offender may earn five days of credit under division (A) of this section if the offender committed that offense on or after September 30, 2011. (5) Except as provided in division (C) of this section, if the most serious offense for which the offender is confined is a felony of the third, fourth, or fifth degree or an unclassified felony and neither division (D)(2) nor (3) of this section applies to the offender, the offender may earn one day of credit under division (A) of this section if the offender committed that offense prior to September 30, 2011, and the offender may earn five days of credit under division (A) of this section if the offender committed that offense on or after September 30, 2011. (E) The department annually shall seek and consider the written feedback of the Ohio prosecuting attorneys association, the Ohio judicial conference, the Ohio public defender, the Ohio association of criminal defense lawyers, and other organizations and associations that have an interest in the operation of the corrections system and the earned credits program under this section as part of its evaluation of the program and in determining whether to modify the program. (F) Days of credit awarded under this section shall be applied toward satisfaction of a person's stated prison term as follows: (1) Toward the definite prison term of a prisoner serving a definite prison term as a stated prison term; (2) Toward the minimum and maximum terms of a prisoner serving an indefinite prison term imposed under division (A)(1)(a) or (2)(a)(A) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code for a felony of the first or second degree committed on or after March 22, 2019. (G) As used in this section: (1) "Sexually oriented offense" has the same meaning as in section 2950.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "Substance use disorder treatment program" means the substance use disorder treatment program established by the department of rehabilitation and correction under section 5120.035 of the Revised Code. Sec. 2967.194. (A)(1) Beginning April 4, 2024, the provisions of this section shall apply, in the manner described in division (G) of this section, to persons confined on or after that date in a state correctional institution or in the substance use disorder treatment program. (2) Except as provided in division (C) of this section and subject to the maximum aggregate total specified in division (A)(4) of this section, a person confined in a state correctional institution or placed in the substance use disorder treatment program may provisionally earn one day or five days of credit, based on the category set forth in division (D)(1) or (2) of this section in which the person is included, toward satisfaction of the person's stated prison term, as described in division (F) of this section, for each completed month during which the person, if confined in a state correctional institution, productively participates in an education program, vocational training, employment in prison industries, treatment for substance abuse, or any other constructive program developed by the department of rehabilitation and correction with specific standards for performance by prisoners or during which the person, if placed in the substance use disorder treatment program, productively participates in the program. Except as provided in division (C) of this section and subject to the maximum aggregate total specified in division (A)(4) of this section, a person so confined in a state correctional institution who successfully completes two programs or activities of that type may, in addition, provisionally earn up to five days of credit toward satisfaction of the person's stated prison term, as described in division (F) of this section, for the successful completion of the second program or activity. The person shall not be awarded any provisional days of credit for the successful completion of the first program or activity or for the successful completion of any program or activity that is completed after the second program or activity. At the end of each calendar month in which a person productively participates in a program or activity listed in this division or successfully completes a program or activity listed in this division, the department of rehabilitation and correction shall determine and record the total number of days credit that the person provisionally earned in that calendar month. If the person in a state correctional institution violates prison rules or the person in the substance use disorder treatment program violates program or department rules, the department may deny the person a credit that otherwise could have been provisionally awarded to the person or may withdraw one or more credits previously provisionally earned by the person. Days of credit provisionally earned by a person shall be finalized and awarded by the department subject to administrative review by the department of the person's conduct. (3) Except as provided in division (C) of this section, unless a person is serving a mandatory prison term or a prison term for an offense of violence or a sexually oriented offense, and notwithstanding the maximum aggregate total specified in division (A)(4) of this section, a person who successfully completes any diploma, equivalence, program, or criteria identified in divisions (A)(3)(a) to (g) of this section shall earn ninety days of credit toward satisfaction of the person's stated prison term or a ten per cent reduction of the person's stated prison term, whichever is less, for each such diploma, equivalence, program, or criteria successfully completed. The diplomas, equivalences, programs, and criteria for which credit shall be granted under this division, upon successful completion, are: (a) An Ohio high school diploma or Ohio certificate of high school equivalence certified by the Ohio central school system; (b) A therapeutic drug community program; (c) All three phases of the department of rehabilitation and correction's intensive outpatient drug treatment program; (d) A career technical vocational school program; (e) A college certification program; (f) The criteria for a certificate of achievement and employability as specified in division (A)(1) of section 2961.22 of the Revised Code; (g) Any other constructive program developed by the department of rehabilitation and correction with specific standards for performance by prisoners. (4) Except for persons described in division (A)(3) of this section, the aggregate days of credit provisionally earned by a person for program or activity participation and program and activity completion under this section and the aggregate days of credit finally credited to a person under this section shall not exceed fifteen per cent of the total number of days in the person's stated prison term. (B) The department of rehabilitation and correction shall adopt rules that specify the programs or activities for which credit may be earned under this section, the criteria for determining productive participation in, or completion of, the programs or activities and the criteria for awarding credit, including criteria for awarding additional credit for successful program or activity completion, and the criteria for denying or withdrawing previously provisionally earned credit as a result of a violation of prison rules, or program or department rules, whichever is applicable. (C) No person confined in a state correctional institution or placed in a substance use disorder treatment program to whom any of the following applies shall be awarded any days of credit under division (A)(2) or (3) of this section: (1) The person is serving a prison term that section 2929.13 or section 2929.14 of the Revised Code specifies cannot be reduced pursuant to this section or this chapter or is serving a sentence for which section 2967.13 or division (B) of section 2929.143 of the Revised Code specifies that the person is not entitled to any earned credit under this section. (2) The person is sentenced to death or is serving a prison term or a term of life imprisonment for aggravated murder, murder, or a conspiracy or attempt to commit, or complicity in committing, aggravated murder or murder. (3) The person is serving a sentence of life imprisonment without parole imposed pursuant to section 2929.03 or 2929.06 of the Revised Code, a prison term or a term of life imprisonment without parole imposed pursuant to section 2971.03 of the Revised Code, or a sentence for a sexually oriented offense that was committed on or after September 30, 2011. (D) This division does not apply to a determination of whether a person confined in a state correctional institution or placed in a substance use disorder treatment program may earn any days of credit under division (A)(2) of this section for successful completion of a second program or activity. The determination of whether a person confined in a state correctional institution may earn one day of credit or five days of credit under division (A)(2) of this section for each completed month during which the person productively participates in a program or activity specified under that division shall be made in accordance with the following: (1) The offender may earn one day of credit under division (A)(2) of this section, except as provided in division (C) of this section, if the offender is serving a stated prison term that includes a prison term imposed for a sexually oriented offense that the offender committed prior to September 30, 2011. (2) Except as provided in division (C) of this section, if division (D)(1) of this section does not apply to the offender, the offender may earn five days of credit under division (A)(2) of this section. (E) The department annually shall seek and consider the written feedback of the Ohio prosecuting attorneys association, the Ohio judicial conference, the Ohio public defender, the Ohio association of criminal defense lawyers, and other organizations and associations that have an interest in the operation of the corrections system and the earned credits program under this section as part of its evaluation of the program and in determining whether to modify the program. (F) Days of credit awarded under this section shall be applied toward satisfaction of a person's stated prison term as follows: (1) Toward the definite prison term of a prisoner serving a definite prison term as a stated prison term; (2) Toward the minimum and maximum terms of a prisoner serving an indefinite prison term imposed under division (A)(1)(a) or (2)(a)(A) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code for a felony of the first or second degree committed on or after March 22, 2019. (G) The provisions of this section apply to persons confined in a state correctional institution or in the substance use disorder treatment program on or after April 4, 2024, as follows: (1) Subject to division (G)(2) of this section, the provisions apply to a person so confined regardless of whether the person committed the offense for which the person is confined in the institution or was placed in the program prior to, on, or after April 4, 2024, and regardless of whether the person was convicted of or pleaded guilty to that offense prior to, on, or after April 4, 2024. (2) The provisions apply to a person so confined only with respect to the time that the person is so confined on and after April 4, 2024, and the provisions of section 2967.193 of the Revised Code that were in effect prior to April 4, 2024, and that applied to the person prior to that date, including the provisions of division (A)(4) of that section as amended by this act H.B. 33 of the 135th general assembly, apply to the person with respect to the time that the person was so confined prior to April 4, 2024. (H) As used in this section: (1) "Sexually oriented offense" has the same meaning as in section 2950.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "Substance use disorder treatment program" means the substance use disorder treatment program established by the department of rehabilitation and correction under section 5120.035 of the Revised Code. Section 2. That existing sections 2929.01, 2929.14, 2929.144, 2929.19, 2953.08, 2967.193, and 2967.194 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 3. Section 2929.14 of the Revised Code is presented in this act as a composite of the section as amended by H.B. 37, H.B. 56, H.B. 111, and S.B. 106, all of the 135th General Assembly. The General Assembly, applying the principle stated in division (B) of section 1.52 of the Revised Code that amendments are to be harmonized if reasonably capable of simultaneous operation, finds that the composite is the resulting version of the section in effect prior to the effective date of the section as presented in this act.